 
 
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K/A
(Amendment No. 1)
 
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year  ended December  31, 2020 
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period fr om                      to                      
Commission File Number: 001-34756
 
Tesla, Inc.
(Exact name of r egistrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Delawar e  91-2197729
(State or  other  jurisdiction of
incorporation or  organization)  (I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
   
3500 Deer  Creek Road
Palo Alto, California  94304
(Addr ess of principal executive offices)  (Zip Code)
(650) 681-5000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including ar ea code)
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
 
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common stock TSLA The Nasdaq Global Select Market
 
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
None
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act.    Yes  ☐    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (“Exchange Act”)
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days.    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  (§
232.405 of this chapter)  during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files).    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a lar ge accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , a smaller reporting company or an emer ging growth
company . See the definitions of “lar ge accelerated filer ,” “accelerated filer ,” “smaller reporting company” and “emer ging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act:
 
Large accelerated filer  ☒   Accelerated filer  ☐
    
Non-accelerated filer  ☐    Smaller reporting company  ☐
       
Emer ging growth company  ☐     
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.    ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’ s assessment of the ef fectiveness of its internal control over financial
reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).    Yes  ☐    No  ☒
The aggregate market value of voting stock held by non-af filiates of the registrant, as of June 30, 2020, the last day of the registrant’ s most recently completed second fiscal
quarter , was $ 160.57  billion (based on the closing price for shares of the registrant’ s Common Stock as reported by the NASDAQ Global Select Market on June 30, 2020).
Shares of Common Stock held by each executive of ficer, director , and holder of 5% or more of the outstanding Common Stock have been excluded in that such persons may be
deemed to be af filiates. This determination of af filiate status is not necessarily a conclusive determination for other purposes.
As of February 1, 2021, there were 959,853,504  shares of the registrant’ s Common Stock outstanding.
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXPLANATORY NOTE
On February 8, 2021, Tesla, Inc. (“Tesla,” the “Company,” “we,” “us,” or “our”) filed our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
fiscal year ended December 31, 2020 (the “Original Form 10-K”). The Original Form 10-K omitted Part III, Items 10 (Directors,
Executive Officers and Corporate Governance), 11 (Executive Compensation), 12 (Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial
Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters), 13 (Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director
Independence) and 14 (Principal Accountant Fees and Services) in reliance on General Instruction G(3) to Form 10-K, which
provides that such information may be either incorporated by reference from the registrant’s definitive proxy statement or included
in an amendment to Form 10-K, in either case filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) not later than 120
days after the end of the fiscal year.
We currently expect that our definitive proxy statement for the 2021 annual meeting of stockholders will be filed later than the
120th day after the end of the last fiscal year. Accordingly, this Amendment No. 1 to Form 10-K (this “Amendment”) is being filed
solely to:
 • amend Part III, Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of the Original Form 10-K to include the information required by such Items;
 • delete the reference on the cover of the Original Form 10-K to the incorporation by reference of portions of our proxy
statement into Part III of the Original Form 10-K; and
 • file new certifications of our principal executive officer and principal financial officer as exhibits to this Amendment
under Item 15 of Part IV hereof, pursuant to Rule 12b-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the
“Exchange Act”).
This Amendment does not otherwise change or update any of the disclosures set forth in the Original Form 10-K and does not
otherwise reflect any events occurring after the filing of the Original Form 10-K.
 
 
 
 
 
TESLA, INC.
AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO ANNUAL REPORT ON FORM 10-K/A
FOR THE YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2020
INDEX
 
    Page
EXPLANATORY NOTE.   
     
PART III.   
    
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance  1
Item 11. Executive Compensation  5
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  24
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence  26
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services  29
    
PART IV.   
    
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules  31
     
   
Signatures  65
 
 
 
i
 
 
PART III
ITEM 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Board of Directors
Background and Qualifications
The names of the members of Tesla’s Board of Directors (the “Board”), their respective ages, their positions with Tesla and
other biographical information as of April 29, 2021 are set forth below. Except for Messrs. Elon Musk and Kimbal Musk, who are
brothers, there are no other family relationships among any of our directors or executive officers.
 
Name  Age  Chair of the
Board  Audit
Committee Compensation
Committee  Nominating
and
Corporate
Governance
Committee  Disclosure
Controls
Committee
Elon Musk  49          
Robyn Denholm  57 X  X  X  X  X
Ira Ehrenpreis  52     X  X   
Lawrence J. Ellison  76          
Antonio Gracias(1)  50   X       
Hiromichi Mizuno  55   X       
James Murdoch  48   X    X  X
Kimbal Musk  48          
Kathleen Wilson-
Thompson 
53     X  X  X
 
(1)Mr. Gracias will not stand for re-election when his current term expires at the 2021 annual meeting of stockholders.
Elon Musk is the Technoking of Tesla and has served as our Chief Executive Officer since October 2008 and as a member of
the Board since April 2004. Mr. Musk has also served as Chief Executive Officer, Chief Technology Officer and Chairman of Space
Exploration Technologies Corporation, an advanced rocket and spacecraft manufacturing and services company (“SpaceX”), since
May 2002, and served as Chairman of the Board of SolarCity Corporation, a solar installation company (“SolarCity”), from July
2006 until its acquisition by us in November 2016. Mr. Musk is also a founder of The Boring Company, an infrastructure company,
and of Neuralink Corp., a company focused on developing brain-machine interfaces. Prior to SpaceX, Mr. Musk co-founded PayPal,
an electronic payment system, which was acquired by eBay in October 2002, and Zip2 Corporation, a provider of Internet enterprise
software and services, which was acquired by Compaq in March 1999. Mr. Musk has also served on the board of directors of
Endeavor Group Holdings, Inc. since April 2021. Mr. Musk holds a B.A. in physics from the University of Pennsylvania and a B.S.
in business from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania.
We believe that Mr. Musk possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including the
perspective and experience he brings as our Chief Executive Officer, one of our founders and our largest stockholder, which brings
historic knowledge, operational expertise and continuity to the Board.
Robyn Denholm has been a member of the Board since August 2014 and its Chair since November 2018. Since January 2021,
Ms. Denholm has been an operating partner of Blackbird Ventures, a venture capital firm. From January 2017 through June 2019,
Ms. Denholm was with Telstra Corporation Limited, a telecommunications company (“Telstra”), where she served as Chief
Financial Officer and Head of Strategy from October 2018 through June 2019, and Chief Operations Officer from January 2017 to
October 2018. Prior to Telstra, from August 2007 to July 2016, Ms. Denholm was with Juniper Networks, Inc., a manufacturer of
networking equipment, serving in executive roles including Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Operations
Officer. Prior to joining Juniper Networks, Ms. Denholm served in various executive roles at Sun Microsystems, Inc. from January
1996 to August 2007. Ms. Denholm also served at Toyota Motor Corporation Australia for seven years and at
1
 
Arthur Andersen & Company for five years in various finance assignments. Ms. Denholm previously served as a director of ABB
Ltd. from 2016 to 2017. Ms. Denholm is a Fellow of the Institute of Chartered Accountants of Australia/New Zealand, a member of
the Australian Institute of Company Directors, and holds a Bachelor’s degree in Economics from the University of Sydney, and a
Master’s degree in Commerce and a Doctor of Business Administration (honoris causa) from the University of New South Wales.
We believe that Ms. Denholm possesses specific attributes that qualify her to serve as a member of the Board and as its Chair
as well as the chair of each of our Audit Committee and Disclosure Controls Committee, such as her executive leadership experience
and her financial and accounting expertise with international companies, including in the technology and automotive industries.
Ira Ehrenpreis has been a member of the Board since May 2007. Mr. Ehrenpreis has been a venture capitalist since 1996. He
is founder and managing member of DBL Partners, a leading impact investing venture capital firm formed in 2015, and previously
led the Energy Innovation practice at Technology Partners. In the venture capital industry, Mr. Ehrenpreis has served on the Board,
Executive Committee, and as Annual Meeting Chairman of the National Venture Capital Association (NVCA). Mr. Ehrenpreis
currently serves as the President of the Western Association of Venture Capitalists (WAVC) and as the Chairman of the VCNetwork,
the largest and most active California venture capital organization. In the Cleantech sector, he has served on several industry boards,
including the American Council on Renewable Energy and the Cleantech Venture Network (Past Chairman of Advisory Board), as
the Chairman of the Clean-Tech Investor Summit for nine years, and on the Stanford Precourt Institute for Energy (PIE) Advisory
Council. Mr. Ehrenpreis also serves as Chairman of the World Energy Innovation Forum. Mr. Ehrenpreis was awarded the 2018
NACD Directorship 100 for his influential leadership in the boardroom and corporate governance community. Mr. Ehrenpreis holds
a B.A. from the University of California, Los Angeles and a J.D. and M.B.A. from Stanford University.
We believe that Mr. Ehrenpreis possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board and to serve as
chair of each of our Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee and our Compensation Committee, including his experience
in the Cleantech and venture capital industries.
Lawrence J. Ellison has been a member of the Board since December 2018. Mr. Ellison is the founder of Oracle Corporation,
a software and technology company, has served as its Chief Technical Officer since September 2014 and previously served as its
Chief Executive Officer from June 1977 to September 2014. Mr. Ellison has also served on Oracle’s board of directors since June
1977, including as its Chairman since September 2014 and previously from May 1995 to January 2004.
We believe that Mr. Ellison possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
long-term leadership of one of the most successful technology companies in the world and experience with technology product
development and strategy.
Antonio Gracias has been a member of the Board since May 2007 and served as our Lead Independent Director from
September 2010 to April 2019. Since 2003, Mr. Gracias has been Chief Executive Officer of Valor Management LLC, a private
equity firm. Mr. Gracias is a director of SpaceX, and was a director of SolarCity until its acquisition by us in November 2016.
Mr. Gracias holds a joint B.S. and M.S. degree in international finance and economics from the Georgetown University School of
Foreign Service and a J.D. from the University of Chicago Law School.
We believe that Mr. Gracias possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
management experience with a nationally recognized private equity firm and his operations management and supply chain
optimization expertise.
Mr. Gracias will not stand for re-election when his current term expires at Tesla’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders.
Hiromichi Mizuno has been a member of the Board since April 2020. Since January 2021, Mr. Mizuno has served as the
United Nations Special Envoy on Innovative Finance and Sustainable Investments. From January 2015
2
 
to March 2020, Mr. Mizuno was Executive Managing Director and Chief Investment Officer of Japan’s Government Pension
Investment Fund, the largest pension fund in the world. Previously, Mr. Mizuno was a partner at Coller Capital, a private equity firm,
from 2003. In addition to being a career-long finance and investment professional, Mr. Mizuno has served as a board member of
numerous business, government and other organizations, currently including the Mission Committee of Danone S.A., a global food
products company, and the World Economic Forum’s Global Future Council. Mr. Mizuno is also involved in academia, having been
named to leadership or advisory roles at Harvard University, Oxford University, University of Cambridge, Northwestern University
and Osaka University. Mr. Mizuno holds a B.A. in Law from Osaka City University and an M.B.A. from the Kellogg Graduate
School of Management at Northwestern University.
We believe that Mr. Mizuno possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
deep understanding of international economics, financial markets and government policies.
James Murdoch has been a member of the Board since July 2017. Mr. Murdoch has been the Chief Executive Officer of Lupa
Systems, a private investment company that he founded, since March 2019. Previously, Mr. Murdoch held a number of leadership
roles at Twenty-First Century Fox, Inc., a media company (“21CF”), over two decades, including its Chief Executive Officer from
2015 to March 2019, its Co-Chief Operating Officer from 2014 to 2015, its Deputy Chief Operating Officer and Chairman and Chief
Executive Officer, International from 2011 to 2014 and its Chairman and Chief Executive, Europe and Asia from 2007 to 2011.
Previously, he served as the Chief Executive Officer of Sky plc from 2003 to 2007, and as the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer
of STAR Group Limited, a subsidiary of 21CF, from 2000 to 2003. Mr. Murdoch formerly served on the boards of News
Corporation from 2013 to 2020, of 21CF from 2007 to 2019 and of Sky plc from 2003 to 2018.
We believe that Mr. Murdoch possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
lengthy executive and board experience across numerous companies, extensive knowledge of international markets and strategies
and experience with the adoption of new technologies.
Kimbal Musk has been a member of the Board since April 2004. Mr. Musk is co-founder and Executive Chairman of The
Kitchen Restaurant Group, a growing family of businesses with the goal of providing all Americans with access to real food that was
founded in 2004. In 2010, Mr. Musk became the Executive Director of Big Green (formerly The Kitchen Community), a non-profit
organization that creates learning gardens in schools across the United States. Mr. Musk also co-founded Square Roots, an urban
farming incubator program, in 2016, and serves as its Chairman. Previously, Mr. Musk was a co-founder of Zip2 Corporation, a
provider of enterprise software and services, which was acquired by Compaq in March 1999. Mr. Musk is a director of SpaceX, and
was a director of Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. from 2013 to 2019. Mr. Musk holds a B. Comm. in business from Queen’s University
and is a graduate of The French Culinary Institute in New York City.
We believe that Mr. Musk possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
business experience in retail and consumer markets, his experience on the Board and his experience with technology companies.
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson has been a member of the Board since December 2018. Ms. Wilson-Thompson served as
Executive Vice President and Global Chief Human Resources Officer of Walgreens Boots Alliance, Inc., a global pharmacy and
wellbeing company, from December 2014 until her retirement in January 2021, and previously served as Senior Vice President and
Chief Human Resources Officer from January 2010 to December 2014. Prior to Walgreens, Ms. Wilson-Thompson held various
legal and operational roles at The Kellogg Company, a food manufacturing company, from July 2005 to December 2009, including
most recently as its Senior Vice President, Global Human Resources. Ms. Wilson-Thompson will also serve on the board of directors
of Wolverine World Wide, Inc. beginning May 2021 and previously served on the board of directors of Ashland Global Holdings Inc.
from 2017 to 2020 and on the board of directors of Vulcan Materials Company from 2009 to 2018. Ms. Wilson-Thompson holds an
A.B. in English Literature from the University of Michigan and a J.D. and L.L.M. (Corporate and Finance Law) from Wayne State
University.
We believe that Ms. Wilson-Thompson possesses specific attributes that qualify her to serve as a member of the Board,
including her executive and board experience with both consumer-focused and industrial companies, as well as her expertise in
managing human resources and other operations at mature companies with large workforces.
3
 
Additional Board Information
On October 16, 2018, the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York entered a final judgment approving the
terms of a settlement filed with the court on September 29, 2018, in connection with the actions taken by the SEC relating to Elon
Musk’s August 7, 2018 Twitter post that he was considering taking Tesla private. On April 26, 2019, this settlement was amended to
clarify certain of its terms, which was subsequently approved by the Court. Mr. Musk did not admit or deny any of the SEC’s
allegations, and there is no restriction on Mr. Musk’s ability to serve as an officer or director on the Board (other than as its Chair for
a specified time).
Audit Committee
The Board has four standing committees comprised solely of independent directors—the Audit Committee, the Compensation
Committee, the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee and the Disclosure Controls Committee. The Audit Committee,
which has been established in accordance with Section 3(a)(58) of the Exchange Act, currently consists of Robyn Denholm, Antonio
Gracias, Hiromichi Mizuno and James Murdoch, each of whom is “independent” as such term is defined for audit committee
members by the listing standards of The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC (“NASDAQ”). Ms. Denholm is the chair of the Audit
Committee. The Board has determined that Ms. Denholm is an “audit committee financial expert” as defined in the rules of the SEC.
Executive Officers
The names of Tesla’s executive officers, their ages, their positions with Tesla and other biographical information as of
April 29, 2021, are set forth below. Except for Messrs. Elon Musk and Kimbal Musk, who are brothers, there are no other family
relationships among any of our directors or executive officers.
 
Name  Age Position
Elon Musk
 49 Technoking of Tesla and
Chief Executive Officer
Zachary Kirkhorn
 36 Master of Coin and Chief Financial
Officer
Jerome Guillen  48 President, Tesla Heavy Trucking
Andrew Baglino  40 Senior Vice President, Powertrain and
Energy Engineering
Elon Musk. For a brief biography of Mr. Musk, see “Board of Directors—Background and Qualifications” under this Item 10
above.
Zachary Kirkhorn is our Master of Coin and has served as our Chief Financial Officer since March 2019. Previously, Mr.
Kirkhorn served in various finance positions continuously since joining Tesla in March 2010, other than between August 2011 and
June 2013 during which he attended business school, including most recently as Vice President, Finance, Financial Planning and
Business Operations from December 2018 to March 2019. Mr. Kirkhorn holds dual B.S.E. degrees in economics and mechanical
engineering and applied mechanics from the University of Pennsylvania and an M.B.A. from Harvard University.
Jerome Guillen has served as our President of Tesla Heavy Trucking since March 2021 and previously served as our
President, Automotive from September 2018 to March 2021, our Vice President, Trucks and Other Programs from January 2016 to
September 2018, our Vice President, Worldwide Sales & Service from April 2013 to August 2015 and our Model S Program Director
from November 2010 to April 2013. Prior to joining us, Mr. Guillen served as Director, Business Innovation at Daimler AG, an
automobile manufacturer, from September 2007 to November 2010. Mr. Guillen also served as Director, New Product Development
at Freightliner LLC, a manufacturer of trucks and heavy duty vehicles, from September 2002 to September 2007. Mr. Guillen holds
a PhD in mechanical engineering from the University of Michigan, in addition to a dual degree in energy technologies from Escuela
Tecnica Superior de Ingenieros Industriales in Madrid and in mechanical engineering from Ecole Nationale Superieure de
Techniques Avancees in Paris.
4
 
Andrew Baglino has served as our Senior Vice President, Powertrain and Energy Engineering since October 2019. Previously,
Mr. Baglino served in various engineering positions continuously since joining Tesla in March 2006. Mr. Baglino holds a B.S. in
electrical engineering from Stanford University.
Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports
Under Section 16 of the Exchange Act, Tesla’s directors, executive officers and any persons holding more than 10% of the
Tesla’s common stock are required to report initial ownership of the Tesla common stock and any subsequent changes in ownership
to the SEC. Specific due dates have been established by the SEC, and Tesla is required to disclose in this Amendment any failure to
file required ownership reports by these dates. Based solely upon a review of forms filed with the SEC and the written
representations of such persons, Tesla is aware of no late Section 16(a) filings other than one late Form 4 report filed by Kathleen
Wilson-Thompson (reporting the exercise of a stock option and the same-day sales of the resulting shares late due to an
administrative delay by Tesla) and one late Form 4 report filed by Antonio Gracias in lieu of the obligation to file two Form 4 reports
(each reporting open-market purchases of shares by a third-party discretionary investment authority without Mr. Gracias’ knowledge
or direction).
Code of Business Conduct and Ethics and Corporate Governance Guidelines
The Board sets high standards for Tesla’s workforce, officers and directors. Tesla is committed to establishing an operating
framework that exercises appropriate oversight of responsibilities at all levels throughout the Company and managing its affairs in a
manner consistent with rigorous principles of business ethics. Accordingly, Tesla has adopted a Code of Business Conduct and
Ethics, which is applicable to Tesla and its subsidiaries’ directors, officers and personnel. Tesla has also adopted Corporate
Governance Guidelines, which, in conjunction with our certificate of incorporation, bylaws and charters of the standing committees
of the Board, form the framework for Tesla’s corporate governance. The Code of Business Conduct and Ethics and the Corporate
Governance Guidelines are each available on Tesla’s website at: http://ir.tesla.com/corporate. Tesla will disclose on its website any
amendment to the Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, as well as any waivers of the Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, that
are required to be disclosed by the rules of the SEC or NASDAQ.
ITEM 11.EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Compensation Discussion and Analysis
The following discussion and analysis of compensation arrangements of our named executive officers for 2020 should be read
together with the compensation tables and related disclosures set forth below. This discussion contains forward-looking statements
that are based on our current considerations, expectations and determinations regarding future compensation programs. The actual
amount and form of compensation and the compensation programs that we adopt may differ materially from current or planned
programs as summarized in this discussion.
The following discussion and analysis relates to the compensation arrangements for 2020 of (i) our principal executive officer,
(ii) our principal financial officer and (iii) the two most highly compensated persons, other than our principal executive officer and
principal financial officer, who were serving as executive officers at the end of our fiscal year ended December 31, 2020 (our
“named executive officers”). We had no other executive officers serving at the end of our fiscal year ended December 31, 2020. Our
named executive officers for fiscal year 2020 were:
    Name  Position
Elon Musk  Technoking of Tesla and
Chief Executive Officer
Zachary Kirkhorn  Master of Coin and Chief Financial
Officer
Jerome Guillen  President, Tesla Heavy Trucking
Andrew Baglino  Senior Vice President, Powertrain and
Energy Engineering
5
 
 
  
Compensation Philosophy
As the world’s first vertically integrated sustainable energy company, our mission is to accelerate the world’s transition to
sustainable energy. We design, develop, manufacture and sell high-performance, fully electric vehicles and energy generation and
storage systems, and also install and maintain such energy systems and sell solar electricity. To achieve our goals, we have designed,
and intend to modify as necessary, our compensation and benefits program and philosophy, to attract, retain and incentivize talented,
deeply qualified and committed executive officers who share our philosophy and desire to work toward these goals. We believe
compensation incentives for executive officers should promote the success of our company and motivate them to pursue corporate
objectives. We have put an emphasis on structuring compensation incentives so as to reward clear, easily measured performance
goals that closely align their incentives with the long-term interests of our stockholders. Further, we have sought to harmonize the
compensation structures of our other employees to conform to our overall compensation philosophy.
Our current compensation programs reflect our startup origins in that they consist primarily of salary and equity awards.
Consistent with our historical compensation philosophy, we do not currently provide an annual cash bonus program or any severance
provisions for continued cash payments or other benefits upon termination of employment with us.
As our needs evolve, we intend to continue to evaluate our philosophy and compensation programs as circumstances require,
and, at a minimum, the Compensation Committee will review executive compensation annually. We may from time to time make
new equity awards and adjustments to the components of our executive compensation program in connection with our periodic
compensation review.
Key Factors in Determining Executive Compensation
Role of Compensation Committee in Executive Compensation
The Compensation Committee has overall responsibility for recommending to the Board the compensation of our Chief
Executive Officer and determining the compensation of our other executive officers. Members of the Compensation Committee are
appointed by the Board. Currently, the Compensation Committee consists of three members of the Board: Ira Ehrenpreis (Chair),
Robyn Denholm and Kathleen Wilson-Thompson, none of whom is an executive officer of Tesla, and each of whom qualifies as
(i) an “independent director” under the NASDAQ Stock Market Rules and (ii) an “outside director” under Section 162(m) of the
Internal Revenue Code (the “Code”).
Role of Compensation Consultants
The Compensation Committee has the authority to engage and has from time to time engaged the services of outside
consultants to assist in making decisions regarding the establishment of Tesla’s compensation philosophy and programs, including
for executives and directors.
Role of Executive Officers in Compensation Decisions
Historically, for executive officers other than our Chief Executive Officer, the Compensation Committee has sought and
considered input from our Chief Executive Officer regarding such executive officers’ responsibilities, performance and
compensation. Specifically, our Chief Executive Officer recommends base salary increases and equity award levels for our senior
personnel, and advises the Compensation Committee regarding the compensation program’s ability to attract, retain and motivate
executive talent. These recommendations reflect compensation levels that our Chief Executive Officer believes are qualitatively
commensurate with an executive officer’s individual qualifications, experience, responsibility level, functional role, knowledge,
skills and individual performance, as well as Tesla’s performance. The Compensation Committee considers our Chief Executive
Officer’s recommendations, but ultimately determines compensation in its judgment, and approves the specific compensation for all
of our executive officers (other than for our Chief Executive Officer, which is approved by the Board). All such compensation
determinations by our Compensation Committee are largely discretionary.
The Compensation Committee meets regularly in executive session. Our Chief Executive Officer is not present during
Compensation Committee deliberations or votes on his compensation and also recuses himself from sessions of the Board where the
Board acts on the Compensation Committee’s recommendations regarding his compensation. In addition, the Board has established a
management committee under the Tesla, Inc. 2019 Equity
6
 
Incentive Plan (the “Equity Award Committee”) to grant and administer equity awards, subject to certain maximum limits on the
seniority of personnel to whom the Equity Award Committee may grant awards and the value of any individual award. For example,
the Equity Award Committee is not authorized to grant awards to executive officer-level employees. Moreover, pursuant to
applicable law, the Equity Award Committee may not grant awards to its members, and the number of shares of our common stock
underlying awards granted by it may not exceed amounts determined by the Board from time to time. The Board has delegated to the
Compensation Committee oversight authority over the Equity Award Committee.
Role of Stockholder Say-on-Pay Votes
At the 2011 annual meeting of our stockholders and at each annual meeting held every three years since, including most
recently in 2020, we held triennial stockholder advisory “say-on-pay” votes on the compensation of our named executive officers for
the immediately preceding fiscal years. Each time, our stockholders overwhelmingly approved the compensation of our named
executive officers, with over 83% of our stockholders present and entitled to vote at each meeting voting in favor of our
compensation policies for our named executive officers. Given these results, and following consideration of them, the Compensation
Committee has decided to retain our overall approach to executive compensation while continuing to evaluate our practices
frequently, including in response to future say-on-pay votes. Moreover, we are required to hold a vote at least every six years
regarding how often to hold a stockholder advisory vote on the compensation of our named executive officers. We held our most
recent such vote at the 2017 annual meeting of stockholders, at which our stockholders indicated a preference for a triennial vote.
Consequently, the Board determined that we will hold a triennial stockholder advisory vote on the compensation of our named
executive officers until they consider the results of our next say-on-pay frequency vote, which will be held at the 2023 annual
meeting of stockholders.
Clawback Policy
Our Corporate Governance Guidelines sets forth a compensation recovery (“clawback”) policy with respect to any annual
incentive payment or long-term incentive payment that may be received by an executive officer, where such payment would be
predicated upon achieving certain financial results that were subsequently the subject of a restatement of our financial statements,
and a lower payment would have been made to the executive based upon the restated financial results. In such case, the Board has
the authority to seek to recover from the executive officer the amount by which such officer’s incentive payments for the relevant
period exceeded the lower payment that would have been made based on the restated financial results.
Moreover, the terms of the performance-based stock option award granted to Elon Musk in January 2018 (the “2018 CEO
Performance Award”) include a clawback provision in the event of a restatement of our financial statements previously filed with the
SEC. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” under
this Item 11 below.
Current Elements of Named Executive Officer Compensation
Overview and Fiscal Year 2020 Company Highlights
Our current executive compensation program, which was developed and approved by the Compensation Committee, generally
consists of base salary, equity-based incentives and other benefits. We combine these elements in order to formulate compensation
packages that provide competitive pay and align the interests of our named executive officers with long-term stockholder interests
by rewarding the achievement of financial, operational and strategic objectives. In 2020, Tesla’s full-year accomplishments under
our executive leadership included the following:
 • Total revenues of $31.54 billion, representing an increase of $6.96 billion compared to the prior year;
 • Net income attributable to common stockholders of $721 million and an operating margin of 6.3%, representing
favorable changes of $1.58 billion and 6.6%, respectively, compared to the prior year;
 • Year-end cash and cash equivalents balance of $19.38 billion, representing an increase of $13.12 billion from the end of
the prior year;
 • Annual vehicle delivery and production records of 499,647 and 509,737 total vehicles;
 • 3.02 gigawatt hours of energy storage and 205 megawatts of solar energy systems deployed; and
7
 
 
 • Ongoing progress in the global growth of our manufacturing capabilities, including the commencement of production of
Model Y, expansion of Gigafactory Shanghai and groundbreaking at Gigafactory Berlin and Gigafactory Texas.
Base Salary
The Compensation Committee is responsible for reviewing our Chief Executive Officer’s and other executive officers’ base
salaries. The base salaries of all executive officers are reviewed annually and adjusted when necessary to reflect individual roles,
performance and the competitive market. Because we typically do not provide cash bonuses to our executive officers, salary is the
primary cash-based element of our executive officers’ compensation structure.
The following table sets forth information regarding the annualized base salary rates at the end of 2020 for our named
executive officers:
    
Name  Ending Fiscal 2020
Base Salary($)(1) 
Elon Musk  —(2)
Zachary Kirkhorn  300,000 
Jerome Guillen  300,000 
Andrew Baglino  300,000 
 
(1)Reflects an annualized rate assuming 52 weeks each comprised of five work days.
(2)Mr. Musk historically earned a base salary that reflected the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law, and
he was subject to income taxes based on such base salary. However, he has never accepted his salary. Commencing in May
2019 at Mr. Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
In April 2020, the base salaries of our named executive officers were reduced by 30%. This reduction was part of a company-
wide reduction (subject to applicable laws) for salaried employees, which was intended to be a proactive and temporary response to
global market conditions. The rate of reduction in base salary for our vice president-level and higher employees, including our
named executive officers, was higher than those applicable to all other salaried employees. Subject to applicable laws, such
reductions were eliminated after approximately 11 weeks.
Equity-Based Incentives
Our equity award program is the primary vehicle for offering long-term incentives to our named executive officers. Our
equity-based incentives have historically been granted in the form of options to purchase shares of our common stock and restricted
stock unit awards that are settled in shares of our common stock upon vesting, and we have granted to our named executive officers
both awards that vest over a long-term period and awards that vest only upon the achievement of specified Tesla performance
milestones, in each case subject to continued service. We believe that equity awards more closely align the interests of our named
executive officers with our stockholders, provide our named executive officers with incentives linked to long-term performance and
create an ownership culture. In addition, the vesting features of our equity awards contribute to executive retention because these
features provide an incentive to our named executive officers to remain in our employ during the scheduled vesting periods or until
the achievement of the applicable performance milestones, which are expected to be achieved over the medium- to long-term. To
date, we have not had an established set of criteria for granting equity awards; instead, the Compensation Committee exercises its
judgment and discretion, in consultation with our Chief Executive Officer and from time to time, a compensation consultant. The
Compensation Committee considers, among other things, the role and responsibility of the named executive officer, competitive
factors, the amount of stock-based equity compensation already held by the named executive officer and the cash-based
compensation received by the named executive officer, to determine the level and types of equity awards that it approves.
The Compensation Committee meets periodically, including to approve equity award grants to our executives from time to
time. We do not have, nor do we plan to establish, any program, plan or practice to time equity award grants in coordination with
releasing material non-public information. We generally grant one-time new hire equity awards to our employees upon their
commencement of employment with us, or upon their promotion to new
8
 
positions. Additionally, as part of our ongoing executive compensation review and alignment process, we periodically grant equity
awards to our executives. See “Grants of Plan-Based Awards in 2020” under this Item 11 below.
Severance and Change in Control Benefits
No named executive officer has a severance or change in control arrangement with Tesla, other than the vesting of the 2018
CEO Performance Award based solely upon the achievement of market capitalization milestones as measured at the time of a change
in control of Tesla. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance
Award” and “Potential Payments Upon Termination or Change in Control” under this Item 11 below.
Bonus
We do not currently have or have planned, and we typically have not historically entered into, any specific arrangements with
our named executive officers providing for cash-based bonus awards.
Non-Equity Incentive Plan Compensation
We did not provide any non-equity incentive plan compensation to any of our named executive officers in 2020, and we do not
currently have or have planned any specific arrangements with our named executive officers providing for non-equity incentive plan
compensation.
Perquisites
Generally, we do not provide any perquisites or other personal benefits to our named executive officers except in certain
limited circumstances.
Health and Welfare Benefits
We provide the following benefits to our named executive officers on the same basis provided to all of our employees:
 • medical insurance including comprehensive transgender coverage, mental health, dental and vision;
 • confidential counseling;
 • life insurance and accidental death and dismemberment insurance;
 • a Section 401(k) plan for which no match by Tesla is provided;
 • an employee stock purchase plan;
 • short-and long-term disability insurance;
 • medical and dependent care flexible spending account; and
 • a health savings account.
Chief Executive Officer Compensation
Overview
Historically, in developing compensation recommendations for our Chief Executive Officer, the Compensation Committee has
sought both to appropriately reward our Chief Executive Officer’s previous and current contributions and to create incentives for our
Chief Executive Officer to continue to contribute significantly to successful results in the future. Each of the 2018 CEO Performance
Award and the performance-based stock option award granted to our Chief Executive Officer in August 2012 (the “2012 CEO
Performance Award”) is focused on this latter objective, as it solely rewards future performance.
In addition to serving as our Chief Executive Officer since October 2008, Elon Musk has contributed significantly and actively
to us since our earliest days in April 2004 by recruiting executives and engineers, contributing to vehicle engineering and design,
raising capital for us and bringing investors to us and raising public awareness of Tesla.
9
 
Cash Compensation
Mr. Musk historically earned a base salary that reflected the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law, and
he was subject to income taxes based on such base salary. However, he has never accepted his salary. Commencing in May 2019 at
Mr. Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
Historical Equity Compensation
Prior to stock option awards made in December 2009, Mr. Musk did not receive any equity compensation for his services for a
period of five years.
In 2010 and 2011, Mr. Musk did not receive any equity grants, because the Compensation Committee believed his existing
grants made in December 2009 already provided sufficient motivation for Mr. Musk to perform his duties as Chief Executive
Officer.
In August 2012, to create incentives for continued long-term success from the then-recently launched Model S program as well
as from Tesla’s then-planned Model X and Model 3 programs, and to further align executive compensation with increases in
stockholder value, the Board granted to Mr. Musk the 2012 CEO Performance Award, comprised of a stock option award to purchase
26,374,505 shares (as adjusted for the five-for-one stock split effected in the form of a stock dividend in August 2020, or the “Stock
Split”) of Tesla’s common stock, representing 5% of Tesla’s total issued and outstanding shares at the time of grant. The 2012 CEO
Performance Award consists of 10 equal vesting tranches, each requiring that Tesla meet a combination of (i) the achievement of a
specified operational milestone relating to development of Model X or Model 3, aggregate vehicle production or a gross margin
target, and (ii) a sustained incremental $4 billion increase in Tesla’s market capitalization from $3.2 billion, Tesla’s market
capitalization at the time of grant. The market capitalization conditions for all of the 10 vesting tranches and nine of the 10
operational milestones have been achieved, and therefore nine of 10 tranches under the 2012 CEO Performance Award have vested.
As of April 29, 2021, only one operational milestone, requiring that Tesla achieve gross margin of 30% or more for four consecutive
quarters, has not been achieved and remains outstanding.
Prior to 2018, the only additional equity awards received by Mr. Musk related to certain immaterial awards granted during
2013 pursuant to a patent incentive program that was available to our employees generally.
2018 CEO Performance Award
Early in 2017, with the 2012 CEO Performance Award heading to substantial completion after having helped Tesla grow its
market capitalization to over $55 billion in just over five years, the independent members of the Board began preliminary
discussions regarding how to continue to incentivize Mr. Musk to lead Tesla through the next phase of its development. In January
2018, following more than six months of careful analysis and development led by the Compensation Committee, with participation
by every independent Board member, the help of Compensia, a national compensation consulting firm, and engagement with and
feedback from our largest institutional stockholders, the Board granted the 2018 CEO Performance Award to Mr. Musk. Such grant
was subject to approval by a majority of the total votes of Tesla common stock not owned by Mr. Musk or Kimbal Musk cast at a
meeting of the stockholders to approve the 2018 CEO Performance Award. On March 21, 2018, such approval was obtained, with
approximately 73% of the votes cast by such disinterested shares voting in favor of the 2018 CEO Performance Award.
10
 
The 2018 CEO Performance Award is comprised of a 10-year maximum term stock option to purchase 101,320,210 shares (as
adjusted for the Stock Split) of Tesla’s common stock, divided equally among 12 separate tranches that are each equivalent to 1% of
the issued and outstanding shares of Tesla’s common stock at the time of grant, at an exercise price of $70.01 per share (as adjusted
for the Stock Split). Each of the 12 vesting tranches of the 2018 CEO Performance Award vests upon certification by the Board that
both (i) the market capitalization milestone for such tranche, which begins at $100 billion for the first tranche and increases by
increments of $50 billion thereafter, and (ii) any one of the following 8 operational milestones focused on revenue or 8 operational
milestones focused on profitability, has been met:
   Total Revenue*
(in billions)  Adjusted EBITDA**
(in billions)
$20.0  $1.5
$35.0  $3.0
$55.0  $4.5
$75.0  $6.0
$100.0  $8.0
$125.0  $10.0
$150.0  $12.0
$175.0  $14.0
 
* “Revenue” means total revenues as reported in Tesla’s financial statements on Forms 10-Q or 10-K filed with the SEC for the
previous four consecutive fiscal quarters.
** “Adjusted EBITDA” means (i) net income (loss) attributable to common stockholders before (ii) interest expense, (iii)
(benefit) provision for income taxes, (iv) depreciation and amortization, and (v) stock-based compensation, as each such item
is reported in Tesla’s financial statements on Forms 10-Q or 10-K filed with the SEC for the previous four consecutive fiscal
quarters.
Any single operational milestone may only satisfy the vesting requirement of one tranche, together with the corresponding
market capitalization milestone. Subject to any applicable clawback provisions, policies or other forfeiture terms, once a milestone is
achieved, it is forever deemed achieved for determining the vesting of a tranche. Meeting more than 12 of the 16 operational
milestones will not result in any additional vesting or other compensation to Mr. Musk under the 2018 CEO Performance Award.
Except in a change in control situation, measurement of the market capitalization milestones will be based on both (i) a six calendar
month trailing average of Tesla’s stock price as well as (ii) a 30 calendar day trailing average of Tesla’s stock price, in each case
based on trading days only. Upon the consummation of certain acquisitions or split-up, spin-off or divestiture transactions, each
then-unachieved market capitalization milestone and/or operational milestone will be adjusted to offset the impact of such
transactions to the extent they could be considered material to the achievement of those milestones.
In establishing the Revenue and Adjusted EBITDA milestones, the Board carefully considered a variety of factors, including
Tesla’s growth trajectory and internal growth plans and the historical performance of other high-growth and high-multiples
companies in the technology space that have invested in new businesses and tangible assets. These benchmarks provided
revenue/EBITDA to market capitalization multiples, which were then used to inform the specific operational targets that aligned
with Tesla’s plans for future growth. Nevertheless, the Board considered each of the market capitalization and operational milestones
to be challenging hurdles. For example, in order to meet all 12 market capitalization milestones, Tesla will have to add
approximately $600 billion to its market capitalization at the time of the grant of the 2018 CEO Performance Award, and in order to
satisfy all eight revenue-based operational milestones, Tesla would have to increase revenue by more than $163 billion from its
annual revenue of approximately $11.8 billion in 2017, the last fiscal year completed prior to the grant of the 2018 CEO
Performance Award.
In addition, Mr. Musk must continue to lead Tesla as our Chief Executive Officer or, alternatively, as our Chief Product Officer
and Executive Chairman (with any other Chief Executive Officer reporting directly to him), at the time each milestone is met in
order for the corresponding tranche to vest. With limited exceptions, Mr. Musk must hold any shares that he acquires upon exercise
of the 2018 CEO Performance Award for at least five years post-exercise. There will be no acceleration of vesting of the 2018 CEO
Performance award upon Mr. Musk’s termination, death or disability, or a change in control of Tesla. However, in a change in
control situation, the achievement of the milestones will be based solely on the market capitalization milestones, with the
measurement of Tesla’s market capitalization determined by the product of the total number of outstanding shares of Tesla common
11
 
stock immediately before the change in control multiplied by the greater of the last closing price of a share of Tesla common stock
before the effective time of the change in control or the per share price (plus the per share value of any other consideration) received
by Tesla’s stockholders in the change in control.
In the event of a restatement of Tesla’s financial statements previously filed with the SEC, if a lesser portion of the 2018 CEO
Performance Award would have vested based on the restated financial results, then Tesla will require forfeiture (or repayment, as
applicable) of the portion of the 2018 CEO Performance Award that would not have vested based on the restated financial results
(less any amounts Mr. Musk may have paid to Tesla in exercising any forfeited awards). The 2018 CEO Performance Award also
will be subject, if more stringent than the foregoing, to any current or future Tesla clawback policy applicable to equity awards,
provided that the policy does not discriminate solely against Mr. Musk except as required by applicable law.
As of April 29, 2021, six operational milestones and 11 market capitalization milestones have been achieved, of which six
operational milestones and six market capitalization milestones have also been certified by our Board of Directors. Consequently, six
of the 12 tranches under the 2018 CEO Performance Award, corresponding to options to purchase an aggregate 50,660,105 shares of
Tesla’s common stock, have vested and become exercisable, subject to Mr. Musk’s payment of the exercise price of $70.01 per share
and the minimum five-year holding period generally applicable to any shares he acquires upon exercise.
Realized Compensation
For purposes of the table in “Summary Compensation Table” under this Item 11 below, we are required to report pursuant to
applicable SEC rules any stock option grants to Mr. Musk at values determined as of their respective grant dates and which are
driven by certain assumptions prescribed by Financial Accounting Board Accounting Standards Codification Topic 718,
“Compensation–Stock Compensation” (“ASC Topic 718”). Moreover, we are required to report in “Pay Ratio Disclosure” under this
Item 11 below (i) Mr. Musk’s annual total compensation, (ii) the median of the annual total compensation of all Tesla employees
qualifying for this analysis, other than Mr. Musk, in each case calculated pursuant to the methodology used for the table under
“Summary Compensation Table,” and (iii) the ratio of the former to the latter.
In addition, we are required to report in “2020 Option Exercises and Stock Vested” under this Item 11 below an amount for the
“value realized” upon: (i) any exercise by Mr. Musk of a stock option, which is based on the difference between the market price of
the underlying shares at the time of exercise and the exercise price of the stock option, and (ii) any vesting of a restricted stock unit
award, based on the market price of the award at the time of vesting. Such amount is required to be reported even if Mr. Musk does
not actually receive any cash from such exercise or vesting, either because he does not also sell any shares or because he sells only a
number of shares sufficient to cover the related tax liabilities resulting from the exercise or vesting.
As a result, there may be a significant disconnect between what is reported as compensation for Mr. Musk in a given year in
such sections and the value actually realized as compensation in that year or over a period of time. Moreover, the vast majority of
compensation in respect of past stock option grants to Mr. Musk, including the 2012 CEO Performance Award and the 2018 CEO
Performance Award, were structured to be incentives for future performance with their value realizable only if Tesla’s stock price
appreciated compared to the dates of the grants, and if the Company achieved applicable vesting requirements.
To supplement the disclosures in “Summary Compensation Table,” “Pay Ratio Disclosure” and “2020 Option Exercises and
Stock Vested” under this Item 11 below, we have included the following table, which shows the total realized compensation of
Mr. Musk for the last three fiscal years, as well as the ratio of Mr. Musk’s realized compensation to the median of the annual total
compensation of all other Tesla employees qualifying for this analysis as reported under “Pay Ratio Disclosure.” Realized
compensation is not a substitute for reported compensation in evaluating our compensation structure, but we believe that realized
compensation is an important factor in understanding that the value of compensation that Mr. Musk ultimately realizes is dependent
on a number of additional factors, including: (i) the vesting of certain of his option awards only upon the successful achievement of
a number of market capitalization increase and operational milestone targets, including milestones that have not yet been achieved
under each of the 2012 CEO Performance Award and the 2018 CEO Performance Award; (ii) the fact that Mr. Musk does not receive
any cash if he does not actually sell shares and thereby reduce his investment in
12
 
us, and he does not receive any cash to the extent that he sells only shares sufficient to cover income taxes with respect to his awards
(including stock options exercised solely to avoid their expiration in accordance with their terms); and (iii) the then-current market
value of our common stock at the times at which Mr. Musk may elect to actually sell his shares.
 
Year   “Total Compensation” of
CEO,
as Reported in Summary
Compensation Table
Below
($)    “Value Realized on Exercise
or Vesting of Awards” of
CEO, as
Reported in Option Exercises
and Stock Vested Table
Below
($)   Median Annual Total
Compensation of all
Qualifying Non-CEO
Employees,
as reported in Pay
Ratio Disclosure
Section Below
($)  Total CEO Realized
Compensation
($)(1)(2)  Ratio of Total CEO
Realized
Compensation to
Median Annual
Total
Compensation of
all Qualifying Non-CEO
Employees
2020  —  —  46,150  —  0.00:1
2019  23,760 (3)  30,483,250 (4)  58,455  23,760  0.41:1
2018  2,284,044,884 (5)  —  56,163 56,380  1.00:1
 
(1)“Total CEO realized compensation” for a given year is defined as (i) the amounts reported for Mr. Musk in “Summary
Compensation Table” under this Item 11 below under the columns “Salary,” “Bonus,” “Non‑Equity Incentive Plan
Compensation” and “All Other Compensation,” plus (ii) with respect to any stock option exercised by Mr. Musk in such year
in connection with which shares of stock were also sold other than to satisfy any resulting tax liability, the difference between
the market price of such shares at the time of exercise and the applicable exercise price of the option, plus (iii) with respect to
any restricted stock unit vested by Mr. Musk in such year in connection with which shares of stock were also sold other than
automatic sales to satisfy any withholding obligations related to such vesting, the market price of such shares at the time of
vesting, plus (iv) any cash actually received by Mr. Musk in respect of any shares sold to cover tax liabilities as described in
(ii) and (iii) above, following the payment of such tax liabilities.
(2)Of the amounts noted, Mr. Musk has not accepted his salary in the amounts of $23,760 and $56,380 for 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
(3)Reflects, for 2019, the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law for part of such year. Commencing in
May 2019 at Mr. Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
(4)Reflects the exercise of a vested stock option award as to which Mr. Musk paid the exercise price in cash. None of the shares
received upon exercise have been sold, and therefore this amount has not been received by Mr. Musk.
(5)Includes $2,283,988,504 attributed to the 2018 CEO Performance Award, which is intended to compensate Mr. Musk over its
10-year maximum term and will become vested as to all shares subject to it only if our market capitalization increases to
$650.0 billion and 12 of 16 total operational milestones are achieved during such 10-year period. Each tranche of 1/12th of the
total number of shares subject to the option becomes vested and exercisable each time: (i) our market capitalization increases
initially to $100.0 billion for the first tranche, and by an additional $50.0 billion for each tranche thereafter; and (ii) one of 16
specified operational milestones relating to total revenue or adjusted EBITDA (other than any operating milestone that
previously counted towards the vesting of another tranche) is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s continued service to us as either
CEO or as both Executive Chairman and Chief Product Officer, with the CEO reporting to him, at each such vesting event.
This award was designed to be entirely an incentive for future performance that would take many years, if at all, to be
achieved. Further, each of the requirements underlying the performance milestones was selected to be very difficult to achieve.
If any options have not vested by the end of the term of the option award, they will be forfeited and Mr. Musk will not realize
the value of such options. As of April 29, 2021, six of the 12 tranches under the 2018 CEO Performance Award have vested
and become exercisable, subject to Mr. Musk’s payment of the exercise price of $70.01 per share and the minimum five-year
holding period generally applicable to any shares he acquires upon exercise. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—
Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” under this Item 11 above.
 
13
 
 
Tax and Accounting Considerations
Sections 280G and 409A. We have not provided or committed to provide any executive officer or director with a gross-up or
other reimbursement for tax amounts the executive might pay pursuant to Section 280G or Section 409A of the Code. Section 280G
and related Code sections provide that executive officers, directors who hold significant stockholder interests and certain other
service providers could be subject to significant additional taxes if they receive payments or benefits in connection with a change in
control of Tesla that exceeds certain limits, and that we or our successor could lose a deduction on the amounts subject to the
additional tax. Section 409A also imposes additional significant taxes on the individual in the event that an executive officer, director
or service provider of certain types receives “deferred compensation” that does not meet the requirements of Section 409A.
Tax Deduction Limit. Section 162(m) of the Code generally disallows a tax deduction to public corporations for compensation
greater than $1,000,000 paid in any fiscal year to certain executive officers. However, prior to the enactment of U.S. tax legislation
in December 2017 (the “Tax Act”), certain types of performance-based compensation were excluded from the $1,000,000 deduction
limit if specific requirements were met. Under the Tax Act, this exclusion for performance-based compensation is not available with
respect to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, unless the compensation is pursuant to a written binding contract which
was in effect on or before November 2, 2017, and which is not modified in any material respect on or after such date. Pursuant to the
Tax Act, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, Section 162(m) of the Code was expanded to cover additional
executive officers and other employees, including the chief financial officer, so that the compensation of the chief executive officer
and chief financial officer (at any time during the fiscal year), the three next most highly compensated executive officers during the
taxable year and any other individual who was considered a “covered employee” for any prior taxable year that begins after 2016,
will be subject to the $1,000,000 deductibility limit under Section 162(m) of the Code. Commencing with our 2018 fiscal year, to the
extent that the aggregate amount of any covered officer’s salary, bonus, any amount realized from certain option exercises and
vesting of restricted stock units or other equity awards, and certain other compensation amounts that are recognized as taxable
income by the officer exceeds $1,000,000, we will not be entitled to a U.S. federal income tax deduction for the amount over
$1,000,000 in that year, unless the compensation qualifies for the transition relief applicable to certain written binding contracts in
effect on or before November 2, 2017. The Compensation Committee has not adopted a formal policy regarding tax deductibility of
compensation paid to our executive officers.
Accounting Implications. We follow ASC Topic 718 for our stock-based compensation awards. ASC Topic 718 requires
companies to measure the compensation expense for all stock-based compensation awards made to employees and directors based
on the grant date “fair value” of these awards. This calculation is performed for accounting purposes and reported in the
compensation tables below, even though our named executive officers may never realize any value from their awards. ASC Topic
718 also requires companies to recognize the compensation cost of their stock-based compensation awards in their income
statements over the period that an executive officer is required to render service in exchange for the option or other award.
Compensation Committee Report
The Compensation Committee oversees Tesla’s compensation programs, policies and practices. The Compensation Committee
has reviewed and discussed the Compensation Discussion and Analysis required by Item 402(b) of Regulation S-K with
management. Based on such review and discussions, the Compensation Committee has recommended to the Board that the
Compensation Discussion and Analysis be included in this Amendment.
Respectfully submitted by the members of the Compensation Committee of the Board
Ira Ehrenpreis (Chair)
Robyn Denholm
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson
 
14
 
 
Summary Compensation Table
The following table presents information concerning the total compensation of our named executive officers for each of the
last three fiscal years. No disclosure is provided for fiscal years for which those persons were not named executive officers.
 
Name and Principal Position  Year Salary
($)  Bonus
($) Stock Awards
($)(1)  Option
Awards
($)(2)  Non-Equity
Incentive Plan
Compensation
($)  All Other
Compensation
($)  Total
($)
Elon Musk  2020  — — — — — — —
Technoking of T esla and
Chief Executive Officer  2019  23,760 (3) — — — — — 23,76
 2018  56,380  — — 2,283,988,504 (4) — — 2,284,044,884
Zachary Kirkhorn  2020  269,663 (5) — — 46,261,354  — 31,099 (6) 46,562,1 1
Master of Coin and Chief
Financial Officer 2019  276,058  — 5,019,998  15,947,901  — — 21,243,95
Jerome Guillen  2020  283,269 (5) — — 46,261,354  — — 46,544,62
President, T esla Heavy
Trucking 2019  301,154  — — 7,965,058  — — 8,266,21
 2018  301,154  — — 17,450,897  — — 17,752,05
Andrew Baglino  2020  283,269 (5) — — 46,261,354  — — 46,544,62
SVP, Powertrain and
Ener gy Engineering 2019  301,154  — — 4,779,080  — — 5,080,234
 
(1)This column reflects the grant date fair value computed in accordance with ASC Topic 718 of the restricted stock unit awards
granted to the named executive officers, which is measured on the grant date based on the closing fair market value of our
common stock. These amounts do not necessarily correspond to the actual value that may be recognized by the named
executive officers, which depends, among other things, on the market value of our common stock.
(2)This column reflects the aggregate grant date fair value computed in accordance with ASC Topic 718 of the options to
purchase shares of our common stock granted to the named executive officers. The assumptions used in the valuation of these
awards are set forth in Note 14, Equity Incentive Plans, to the consolidated financial statements included in the Original Form
10-K. These amounts do not necessarily correspond to the actual value that may be recognized by the named executive
officers, which depends, among other things, on the market value of our common stock appreciating from that on the grant
date(s) of the option(s).
(3)Reflects the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law for part of 2019. Commencing in May 2019 at Mr.
Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
(4)Reflects the 2018 CEO Performance Award, which is intended to compensate Mr. Musk over its 10-year maximum term and
will become vested as to all shares subject to it only if our market capitalization increases to $650.0 billion and 12 of 16 total
operational milestones are achieved during such 10-year period. Each tranche of 1/12th of the total number of shares subject to
the option will become vested and exercisable each time: (i) our market capitalization increases initially to $100.0 billion for
the first tranche, and by an additional $50.0 billion for each tranche thereafter; and (ii) one of 16 specified operational
milestones relating to total revenue or adjusted EBITDA (other than any operating milestone that previously counted towards
the vesting of another tranche) is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s continued service to us as either CEO or as both Executive
Chairman and Chief Product Officer, with the CEO reporting to him, at each such vesting event. This award was designed to
be entirely an incentive for future performance that would take many years, if at all, to be achieved. Further, each of the
requirements underlying the performance milestones was selected to be very difficult to achieve. If any options have not
vested by the end of the term of the option award, they will be forfeited and Mr. Musk will not realize the value of such
options. As of April 29, 2021, six of the 12 tranches under the 2018 CEO Performance Award have vested and become
exercisable, subject to Mr. Musk’s payment of the exercise price of $70.01 per share and the minimum five-year holding
period generally applicable to any shares he acquires upon exercise. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief
Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” and “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief
Executive Officer Compensation—Realized Compensation” under this Item 11 above.
(5)Reflects a temporary reduction to base salary in response to global market conditions.  
(6)Reflects an amount corresponding to previously-accrued paid time off that was applied toward the purchase of a Tesla vehicle
pursuant to a company-wide program.
15
 
Pay Ratio Disclosure
Tesla is committed to fair and competitive compensation for our employees. Moreover, Elon Musk, the Technoking of Tesla
and our Chief Executive Officer, has agreed to a compensation arrangement in the 2018 CEO Performance Award that is
substantially tied to the appreciation of our market capitalization. Because equity awards are generally made available to Tesla
employees, this also means that Mr. Musk’s compensation is tied to the success of Tesla employees. We are providing a ratio of (i)
Mr. Musk’s 2020 annual total compensation to (ii) the median of the 2020 annual total compensation of all applicable qualifying
Tesla employees other than Mr. Musk, as if all of such employees were named executive officers, in each case calculated pursuant to
the disclosure requirements of “Summary Compensation Table” above. As we continue our international expansion, the median
annual total compensation of our employees reflects differences in local compensation scales and practices abroad to a greater
extent.
Mr. Musk’s 2020 annual total compensation, as reported under “Summary Compensation Table,” was $0, and the median 2020
annual total compensation of all other qualifying employees, as determined pursuant to the methodology set forth below, was
$46,150. Consequently, the applicable ratio of such amounts for 2020 was 0.00:1.
Our methodology for identifying the median of the 2020 annual total compensation for each individual other than Mr. Musk
was as follows:
 • We determined that as of December 31, 2020, Tesla and all of our subsidiaries had 68,854 individuals qualifying for this
analysis (full-time, part-time and temporary employees other than Mr. Musk, subject to the following bullet), of which
approximately 33% were based outside of the U.S. and approximately 35% were production line employees.
 • We did not include in the population of qualifying individuals any employees of staffing agencies whose compensation
is determined by such agencies.
 • We applied the requirements and assumptions required for the table under “Summary Compensation Table” above for
each of such individuals as if he or she was a named executive officer to calculate the total annual compensation,
including base salary or wages, performance-based commission payments, and equity awards based on their grant date
fair values.
 • We converted any payment earned or paid in a foreign currency to U.S. dollar using the average of the prevailing
conversion rates for the month of December 2020.
 • We selected the median of all total annual compensation amounts calculated in accordance with the foregoing.
16
 
Grants of Plan-Based Awards in 2020
The following table presents information concerning each grant of an award made to a named executive officer in fiscal 2020
under any plan.
 
Name 
Grant
Date(1)   All Other
Option
Awards:
Number of
Securities Underlying
Options(#)  Exercise
or
Base
Price of
Option Awards
($/Sh)  Grant Date Fair
Value of Stock and Option
Awards ($) 
Elon Musk  —  — — — 
Zachary J. Kirkhorn  10/19/2020 (2) 205,459  430.83  46,261,354  
Jerome Guillen  10/19/2020 (2) 205,459  430.83  46,261,354  
Andrew Baglino  10/19/2020 (2) 205,459  430.83  46,261,354  
 
(1)The vesting schedule applicable to each outstanding award is set forth in “Outstanding Equity Awards at 2020 Fiscal Year-
End” under this Item 11 below.
(2)This award was granted as part of Tesla’s ongoing executive compensation review and alignment process.
Outstanding Equity Awards at 2020 Fiscal Year-End
The following table presents information concerning unexercised options and unvested restricted stock unit awards for each
named executive officer outstanding as of the end of fiscal 2020.
 
  Option Awards   Stock Awards  
Name  Grant Date   Number  of
Securities
Underlying
Unexer cised
Options (#)
Exer cisable   Number  of
Securities
Underlying
Unexer cised
Options (#)
Unexer cisable   Equity
Incentive
Plan
Awards:
Number  of
Securities
Underlying
Unexer cised
Unearned
Options (#)   Option
Exer cise
Price ($)   Option
Expiration
Date   Number  of
Shar es or
Units of
Stock That
Have Not
Vested
(#)   Market
Value of
Shar es or
Units of Stock
That Have
Not Vested
($)(1)  
Elon Musk   3/21/2018(2)  33,773,400   —   67,546,810   70.01   1/19/2028   —   — 
   6/10/2013(3)  1,750   —   —   20.01   6/10/2023   —   — 
   4/8/2013(3)  1,750   —   —   8.37   4/8/2023   —   — 
   8/13/2012(4)  22,862,050   —   2,637,455   6.24   8/13/2022   —   — 
Zachary J. Kirkhorn   10/19/2020(5)  4,280   201,179   —   430.83   10/19/2030   —   — 
   4/19/2019(6)  283,518   364,527   —   54.66   4/19/2029   —   — 
   4/19/2019(7)  —   —   —   —   —   45,000   31,755,150 
   1/22/2019(8)  21,769   32,661   —   59.79   1/22/2029   —   — 
   1/22/2019(9)  —   —   —   —   —   10,890   7,684,746 
   10/16/2018(10)  5,568   7,357   —   55.32   10/16/2028   —   — 
   10/16/2018(9)  —   —   —   —   —   2,589   1,826,980 
   11/13/2017(11)  —   —   —   —   —   936   660,507 
   5/8/2017(12)  —   —   —   —   —   720   508,082 
Jerome Guillen   10/19/2020(5)  4,280   201,179   —   430.83   10/19/2030   —   — 
   7/19/2019(13)  45,111   245,819   —   51.64   7/19/2029   —   — 
   10/16/2018(14)  214,020   292,955   —   55.32   10/16/2028   —   — 
   2/12/2018(15)  127,082   97,918   —   63.15   2/12/2028   —   — 
   10/9/2017(16)  38,735   —   19,370   68.59   10/9/2027   —   — 
   8/14/2017(17)  37,866   7,754   —   72.76   8/13/2027   —   — 
   4/10/2017(12)  —   —       —   —   2,423   1,709,838 
   6/13/2016(18)  —   —   102,350   43.58   6/13/2026   —   — 
   1/13/2014(19)  15,000   —   68,750   27.87   1/13/2024   —   — 
Andrew Baglino   10/19/2020(5)  4,280   201,179   —   430.83   10/19/2030   —   — 
   7/19/2019(20)  57,999   147,561   —   51.64   7/19/2029   —   — 
   10/16/2018(10)  22,400   29,300   —   55.32   10/16/2028   —   — 
   10/16/2018(9)  —   —   —   —   —   10,342   7,298,039 
   3/19/2018(21)  36,864   33,136   —   62.70   3/19/2028   —   — 
   2/20/2018(22)  —   —   —   —   —   4,618   3,258,784 
   1/11/2016(23)  5,570   —   —   41.57   1/11/2026   —   — 
   11/10/2014(19)  —   —   12,500   48.39   11/10/2024   —   — 
 
(1)The market value of unvested restricted stock units is calculated by multiplying the number of unvested restricted stock units
held by the applicable named executive officer by the closing price of our common stock on December 31, 2020, which was
$705.67.
17
 
(2)1/12th of the total number of shares subject to the option becomes vested and exercisable each time: (i) our market
capitalization increases initially to $100.0 billion for the first tranche, and by an additional $50.0 billion for each tranche
thereafter; and (ii) one of 16 specified operational milestones relating to total revenue or adjusted EBITDA (other than any
operating milestone that previously counted towards the vesting of another tranche) is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s
continued service to us as either CEO or as both Executive Chairman and Chief Product Officer, with the CEO reporting to
him, at each such vesting event. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018
CEO Performance Award” under this Item 11 above.
(3)Stock option awards granted as part of our company-wide patent incentive program. The total number of shares subject to the
option was vested and exercisable on the applicable grant date of the option.
(4)1/10th of the total number of shares subject to the option became and will become vested and exercisable each time: (i) our
market capitalization increases by $4.0 billion above the initially measured market capitalization of $3.2 billion; and (ii) one of
10 specified performance milestones relating to the development of our Model X and Model 3 vehicles and our total
production of vehicles is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s continued service to us at each such vesting event. If any shares have
not vested by the end of the term of the option, they will be forfeited and Mr. Musk will not realize the value of such shares.
As of April 29, 2021, 10 market capitalization milestones and nine performance milestones have been achieved. See
“Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—Historical Equity Compensation” under
this Item 11 above.
(5)1/48th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on December 5, 2020, and 1/48th of the shares subject
to the option become vested and exercisable every month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each
such vesting date.
(6)1/8th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on September 13, 2019, and 1/48th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
(7)1/8th of this award became vested on December 5, 2019, and 1/16th of this award becomes vested every three months
thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(8)1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on January 5, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares subject to
the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such
vesting date.
(9)1/20th of this award vested on March 5, 2019, and 1/20th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(10)1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on November 1, 2018, and 1/60th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
(11)1/16th of this award vested on December 5, 2017, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(12)1/16th of this award vested on September 5, 2017, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(13)1/10th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on December 24, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
(14)1/10th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on April 1, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares subject to
the option become vested and exercisable every month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such
vesting date.
(15)1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on March 12, 2018, and 1/60th of the shares subject to
the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such
vesting date.
(16)1/3rd of the shares subject to the option became or will become vested and exercisable upon the achievement, as determined
by the Board, of each of three specified performance goals relating to weekly or cumulative deliveries of certain of our current
and future vehicles, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(17)   1/48th of the shares subject to the option vested or shall vest monthly starting on the one-month anniversary of the applicable
grant date, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
18
 
(18)1/4th of the shares subject to the option became or will become vested and exercisable upon the achievement, as determined
by the Board, of each of four specified performance goals relating to the development, cumulative deliveries, and cumulative
revenues for certain of our vehicles, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(19)1/4th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable upon each of the following, as determined by the
Board: (i) the completion of the first Model X production vehicle; (ii) aggregate vehicle production of 100,000 vehicles in a
trailing 12-month period; and (iii) completion of the first Model 3 production vehicle. 1/4 of the shares subject to this option
will become vested and exercisable upon the determination by the Board that annualized gross margin of greater than 30.0% in
any three years is achieved, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(20)1/60th of the total shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on July 24, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable every month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
(21)1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on March 27, 2018, and 1/60th of the shares subject to
the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such
vesting date.
(22)1/16th of this award vested on June 5, 2018, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(23)1/16th of this award vested on June 5, 2016, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
2020 Option Exercises and Stock Vested
The following table presents information concerning each exercise of stock options and vesting of stock awards during fiscal
2020 for each of the named executive officers.
 
   Option Awards   Stock Awards  
Name   Number of Shares
Acquired on Exercise
(#)    Value Realized on
Exercise
($)(1)   Number of Shares
Acquired on Vesting
(#)    Value Realized on
Vesting
($)(2)  
Elon Musk   —   —   —   — 
Zachary Kirkhorn   10,000    4,189,900    27,050    8,828,173  
Jerome Guillen   121,615    29,759,847    7,687    2,079,874  
Andrew Baglino   68,590    14,855,479    9,900    2,790,956  
 
(1)Reflects the product of the number of shares of stock subject to the exercised option multiplied by the difference between the
market price of our common stock at the time of exercise on the exercise date and the exercise price of the option.
(2)Reflects the product of the number of shares of stock vested multiplied by the market price of our common stock on the
vesting date.
Potential Payments Upon Termination or Change in Control
We do not have an employment agreement for any specific term with any of our named executive officers. Moreover, we do
not have any contract, agreement, plan or arrangement that would result in payments to a named executive officer at, following, or in
connection with any termination of employment, including resignation, severance, retirement or a constructive termination of
employment of a named executive officer, or a change in control of Tesla (other than the vesting of the 2018 CEO Performance
Award based solely upon the achievement of market capitalization milestones as measured at the time of a change in control of
Tesla, which by its nature cannot be estimated at this time) or a change in the named executive officer’s responsibilities. See also
“Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” under this Item
11 above.
19
 
Employee Compensation Risks
The Compensation Committee oversees management of risks relating to Tesla’s compensation plans and programs. Tesla’s
management and the Compensation Committee have assessed the risks associated with Tesla’s compensation policies and practices
for all employees, including non-executive officers. These include risks relating to setting ambitious targets for our employees’
compensation or the vesting of their equity awards and our emphasis on at-risk equity-based compensation, and the potential impact
of such practices on the retention or decision-making of our employees, particularly our senior management. Based on the results of
this assessment, Tesla does not believe that its compensation policies and practices for all employees, including non-executive
officers, create risks that are reasonably likely to have a material adverse effect on Tesla.
Compensation of Directors
2020 Director Compensation Table
The following table provides information concerning the compensation paid by us to each of our non-employee directors who
served during any part of fiscal year 2020. Elon Musk, who is a named executive officer, does not receive additional compensation
for his services as a director.
The awards with respect to which values are provided under the column “Option Awards” below are exclusively stock options,
which have realizable value only if they actually vest over time and to the extent, if any, that our stock price exceeds the applicable
exercise prices. The values provided below for these awards are based on applicable accounting standards, and do not necessarily
reflect the actual amounts realized or realizable pursuant to the underlying stock options.  
                  
Name   Fees Earned or
Paid in Cash
($)    Option Awards
($)(1)(2)(3) 
  All Other
Compensation  
Total
($)
Robyn Denholm   86,250 (4)  5,630,509   46,752 (5)  5,763,51 1 
Ira Ehrenpreis   37,500    —  —   37,500  
Lawrence J. Ellison   20,000    —  —   20,000  
Antonio Gracias   26,346    1,160,462   —   1,186,808  
Hiromichi Mizuno   18,963    9,209,853       9,228,816  
James Murdoch   32,500    —  —   32,500  
Kimbal Musk   20,000    —      20,000  
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson   30,000    —  —   30,000  
Stephen Jurvetson(6)   20,027    —  —   20,027  
 
(1)As of December 31, 2020, the aggregate number of shares underlying option awards outstanding for each of our non-employee
directors with such awards was:
 
Name   Aggr egate Number  of
Shar es Underlying
Options Outstanding  
Robyn Denholm   804,160  
Ira Ehrenpreis   740,000  
Lawrence J. Ellison   291,670  
Antonio Gracias   489,240  
Hiromichi Mizuno   117,230  
James Murdoch   423,340  
Kimbal Musk   209,250  
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson   290,285  
 
(2)Reflects the aggregate grant date fair value computed in accordance with ASC Topic 718. The assumptions used in the
valuation of option awards are set forth in the notes to our consolidated financial statements, which are included in Note 14,
Equity Incentive Plans, to the consolidated financial statements included in the Original Form 10-K. These amounts do not
necessarily correspond to the actual value that may be recognized by our non-employee directors, which depends, among other
things, on the market value of our common stock appreciating from that on the grant date(s) of the option(s). Following
vesting, the actual receipt of any shares by each recipient will further be subject to his or her payment of the applicable
exercise price.
20
 
(3)Reflects stock option grants for service on the Board or as members or chairs of Board committees that were automatically
granted pursuant to our non-employee director compensation policy. Prior to February 2020, such stock options were generally
granted automatically once every three years, and such awards vest monthly over three years, subject to continued service. See
“Compensation of Directors—Non-Employee Director Compensation Arrangements” under this Item 11 below for more detail.
(4)Reflects cash compensation prior to the waiver of future cash payments by Ms. Denholm. See “Compensation of Directors—
Non-Employee Director Compensation Arrangements” under this Item 11 below for more detail.
(5)Consists of reimbursements for out-of-pocket travel expenses in connection with Board service, including attendance at Board
or Board committee meetings, submitted in 2020.
(6)Board term ended in September 2020 without standing for re-election at the 2020 annual meeting of stockholders.
Non-Employee Director Compensation Arrangements
Overview and Philosophy
Our director compensation policy that is applicable to all of Tesla’s non-employee directors is designed to be consistent with
our compensation philosophy for our employees, with an emphasis on equity-based compensation over cash in order to align the
value of their compensation with the market value of our stock, and consequently, with the long-term interests of our stockholders.
Moreover, while we offer to our employees restricted stock units, which tend to retain some value even if the market value of our
stock decreases, the equity-based compensation to our directors is exclusively in the form of stock options, which have value only to
the extent, if any, that our stock price increases following their grant. Conversely, fluctuating stock prices have at times resulted in
100% of the vested stock options then held by each of our non-employee directors being out-of-the-money. Consequently, a large
portion of our non-employee directors’ compensation is entirely at risk.
Outside Director Compensation Policy
Our current director compensation policy provides that each non-employee director will receive the following compensation
for Board and Board committee services, as applicable. Historically, automatically granted stock option awards for such services
were made only once every three years, vesting in equal monthly tranches over such period. In February 2020, the Board amended
the director compensation policy with prospective effectiveness, such that future stock option awards to purchase one-third of the
previously applicable numbers of shares would be automatically granted annually, in lieu of such triennial grants. The policy
currently provides for the following compensation, which reflects the foregoing as well as the Stock Split:
 • an annual cash retainer for general Board service of $20,000;
 • no cash awards for attendance of general Board meetings;
 • an annual cash retainer for serving as the chair of the Audit Committee of $15,000, for serving as the chair of the
Compensation Committee of $10,000 and for serving as the chair of the Nominating and Corporate Governance
Committee of $7,500;
 • an annual cash retainer for serving on the Audit Committee of $7,500 per member, for serving on the Compensation
Committee of $5,000 per member, and for serving on the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of $5,000
per member;
 • upon first joining the Board, an automatic initial grant of a stock option to purchase a number of shares of our common
stock equal to 6,945 multiplied by the number of months (rounded up to a whole number) between the date on which
such director joined the Board and the first June 18 following such date (the “Initial Annual Award Grant Date”), vesting
100% on the Initial Annual Award Grant Date (subject to continued service through such date);
21
 
 • (i) on the Initial Annual Award Grant Date, or for a director who was previously granted an outstanding stock option for
Board service to purchase 250,000 shares of our common stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which such
award fully vests, and (ii) in either case every year thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 83,340
shares of our common stock;
 • for serving as the lead independent director, (i) shortly following appointment as the lead independent director, or for a
director who was previously granted an outstanding stock option for such service to purchase 120,000 shares of our
common stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which such award fully vests, and (ii) in either case every
year thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 40,000 shares of our common stock;
 • for serving as a member of the Audit Committee, the Compensation Committee or the Nominating and Corporate
Governance Committee, (i) shortly following appointment as a member of such Committee, or for a director who was
previously granted an outstanding stock option for such service to purchase 60,000 shares, 45,000 shares, or 30,000
shares, respectively, of our common stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which such award fully vests,
and (ii) in either case every year thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 20,000 shares, 15,000
shares, or 10,000 shares, respectively, of our common stock; and
 • in addition to any applicable grant in the immediately preceding bullet, for serving as the chair of the Audit Committee,
the Compensation Committee or the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, (i) shortly following
appointment as the chair of such Committee, or for a director who was previously granted an outstanding stock option
for such service to purchase 60,000 shares, 30,000 shares, or 15,000 shares, respectively, of our common stock vesting
monthly over three years, the date on which such award fully vests, and (ii) in either case every year thereafter, an
automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 20,000 shares, 10,000 shares, or 5,000 shares, respectively, of our common
stock.
Unless noted above, each automatic stock option grant for service as a member of the Board, lead independent director,
member of a Board committee or chair of a Board committee, in each case as described above, will vest in equal monthly tranches
over one year (or, for awards granted prior to the amendment of the director compensation policy in February 2020, over three years)
starting on the one month anniversary of the vesting commencement date, subject to continued service in the capacity for which such
grant was made (except that if a director who was granted such an option ceases to be a director on the day before an annual meeting
that is held earlier than the anniversary date of the vesting commencement date for that calendar year, vesting will accelerate with
respect to the shares that would have vested if such director continued service through such anniversary date).
Our director compensation policy also provides that the earning and payment of cash retainer payments payable to outside
directors may be waived in whole or part at the election of the director.
Chair of the Board Compensation
In addition, the Board previously approved the following additional compensation arrangements for Robyn Denholm for her
service as Chair of the Board, commencing on July 1, 2019:
 • an annual cash retainer of $300,000; and
 • an automatic annual grant of a stock option to purchase 8,000 shares of our common stock, which will vest 1/12th per
month for 12 months starting on the one month anniversary of the vesting commencement date, subject to
Ms. Denholm’s continued service as Chair of the Board (except that if Ms. Denholm ceases to be a director on the day
before an annual meeting that is held earlier than the anniversary date of the vesting commencement date, vesting will
accelerate with respect to the shares that would have vested if she had continued service through such anniversary date).
22
 
From July 2020, Ms. Denholm requested that Tesla eliminate the future payment to her of all cash retainer amounts for service
on the Board, as its Chair and on the various committees of the Board, citing a desire in her Board leadership role to have 100% of
her compensation at risk and aligned with the interests of stockholders. Moreover, in consideration of the significant impact on travel
and other circumstances resulting from the global COVID-19 pandemic, Ms. Denholm also requested that the grant of her automatic
annual stock option award in 2020 for service as Chair of the Board be deferred.
Other Information
If, following a change in control of Tesla, the service of a non-employee director is terminated, all stock options granted to the
director pursuant to the compensation policy shall fully vest and become immediately exercisable.
Non-employee directors may also have their travel, lodging and related expenses associated with attending Board or Board
committee meetings reimbursed by Tesla.
Pledging of Shares
The ability of our directors and executive officers to pledge Tesla stock for personal loans and investments is inherently related
to their compensation due to our use of equity awards and promotion of long-termism and an ownership culture. Moreover,
providing these individuals flexibility in financial planning without having to rely on the sale of shares aligns their interests with
those of our stockholders.
In order to mitigate the risk of forced sales of pledged shares, the Board has a policy that limits pledging of Tesla stock by our
directors and executive officers. Pursuant to this policy, directors and executive officers may pledge their stock (exclusive of options,
warrants, restricted stock units or other rights to purchase stock) as collateral for loans and investments, provided that the maximum
aggregate loan or investment amount collateralized by such pledged stock does not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total
value of the pledged stock.
Example: A director pledges 1,000 shares as collateral for a loan, and the current stock price is $800 per share.
The director may borrow up to 25% of 1,000 x $800, or $200,000, against such shares. If the stock price later
increases to $1,600 per share, the director may borrow up to an additional $200,000 against the pledged shares. If
the director borrows the full allowable amount of $400,000 and the stock price then decreases to $1,200, the
director must repay $100,000 to maintain compliance with the 25% limit under the pledging policy.
See “Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters—Ownership of
Securities” under Item 12 below for information regarding any shares pledged by our directors or executive officers as of December
31, 2020; however, such pledging does not indicate the extent to which there may be actual borrowings against such shares as of
such date. Tesla management monitors compliance with this policy by reviewing and, if necessary, reporting to the Board or its
committees the extent to which any officer or director has pledged shares of Company stock. We believe that this monitoring is
effective and includes appropriate controls, and we have confirmed that each of our directors and executive officers who have
pledged stock are and have been compliant with this policy since our last confirmation.
Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation
Robyn Denholm, Ira Ehrenpreis and Kathleen Wilson-Thompson served as members of the Compensation Committee during
2020. None of such persons is or was formerly an officer or an employee of Tesla. During 2020, no interlocking relationships existed
between any member of Tesla’s Board or Compensation Committee and any member of the board of directors or compensation
committee of any other company.
 
 
23
 
 
ITEM 12.SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table summarizes the number of securities underlying outstanding options, stock awards, warrants and rights
granted to employees and directors, as well as the number of securities remaining available for future issuance, under Tesla’s equity
compensation awards as of December 31, 2020.
 
   (a)   (b)    (c)  
Plan category  Number of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of outstanding
options, warrants and
rights
(#)(1)   Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
($)(2)   Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation
plans (excluding
securities reflected in
column (a))
(#)  
Equity compensation plans approved
by
   security holders   165,518,314   68.25   83,327,043(3)
Equity compensation plans not
approved by
   security holders   196,934(4)  79.48   — 
Total   165,715,248   68.26   83,327,043 
 
(1)Consists of options to purchase shares of our common stock, including the 2018 CEO Performance Award, and restricted stock
unit awards representing the right to acquire shares of our common stock.
(2)The weighted average exercise price is calculated based solely on the outstanding stock options. It does not take into account
the shares issuable upon vesting of outstanding restricted stock unit awards, which have no exercise price.
(3)Consists of 49,045,518 shares remaining available for issuance under the Tesla, Inc. 2019 Equity Incentive Plan, and
34,281,525 shares remaining available for issuance under the Tesla, Inc, 2019 Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
(4)Consists of outstanding stock options and restricted stock unit awards that were assumed in connection with acquisitions. No
additional awards may be granted under the plans pursuant to which such awards were initially granted.
 
24
 
 
Ownership of Securities
The following table sets forth certain information regarding the beneficial ownership of Tesla’s common stock, as of
December 31, 2020, for the following:
 • each person (or group of affiliated persons) who is known by us to beneficially own 5% of the outstanding shares of our
common stock;
 • each of our non-employee directors;
 • each of our current executive officers named in the Summary Compensation Table in Item 11 above; and
 • all current directors and executive officers of Tesla as a group.
In computing the number of shares of common stock beneficially owned by a person and the percentage ownership of that
person, we deemed to be outstanding all shares of common stock subject to options or other convertible securities held by that
person or entity that are currently exercisable or exercisable within 60 days of December 31, 2020. We did not deem these shares
outstanding, however, for the purpose of computing the percentage ownership of any other person. Applicable percentage ownership
is based on 959,552,475 shares of Tesla’s common stock outstanding at December 31, 2020.
Unless otherwise indicated, all persons named below can be reached at Tesla, Inc., 3500 Deer Creek Road, Palo Alto,
California 94304.
 
Beneficial Owner Name  Shares
Beneficially
Owned    Percentage
of Shares
Beneficially
Owned  
5% Stockholders         
Elon Musk(1)   227,131,935    22.4%
The Vanguard Group(2)   57,814,310    6.0%
Blackrock, Inc.(3)   50,080,396    5.2%
Capital Ventures International(4)   49,569,773    5.2%
Named Executive Officers & Dir ectors         
Elon Musk(1)   227,131,935    22.4%
Zachary J. Kirkhorn(5)   410,640    * 
Jerome Guillen(6)   587,302    * 
Andrew Baglino(7)   167,365    * 
Robyn Denholm(8)   728,881    * 
Ira Ehrenpreis(9)   817,706    * 
Lawrence J. Ellison(10)   15,186,807    1.6%
Antonio Gracias(1 1)   1,738,393    * 
Hiromichi Mizuno(12)   84,450    * 
James Murdoch(13)   434,650    * 
Kimbal Musk(14)   811,212    * 
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson(15)   151,805    * 
All current executive of ficers and directors as a group (12 persons)(16)   248,251,146    24.3%
 
* Represents beneficial ownership of less than 1%.
(1)Includes (i) 170,492,985 shares held of record by the Elon Musk Revocable Trust dated July 22, 2003 and (ii) 56,638,950
shares issuable to Mr. Musk upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020. Includes
92,331,125 shares pledged as collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness.
(2)Includes shares beneficially owned by The Vanguard Group, of which The Vanguard Group has shared voting power over
1,305,269 shares, sole dispositive power over 54,445,577 shares and shared dispositive power over 3,368,733 shares. The
address for The Vanguard Group is 100 Vanguard Blvd., Malvern, PA 19355. The foregoing information is based solely on
Schedule 13G of The Vanguard Group filed on February 10, 2021, which we do not know or have reason to believe is not
complete or accurate and on which we are relying pursuant to applicable SEC regulations.
25
 
(3)Includes shares beneficially owned by BlackRock, Inc., of which Blackrock, Inc. has sole voting power over 43,700,653
shares and sole dispositive power over 50,080,396 shares. The address for Blackrock, Inc. is 55 East 52nd Street, New York,
NY 10055. The foregoing information is based solely on Schedule 13G of Blackrock, Inc. filed on February 5, 2021, which we
do not know or have reason to believe is not complete or accurate and on which we are relying pursuant to applicable SEC
regulations.
(4)Includes 187,272 shares beneficially owned by Capital Ventures International, 14,668 shares beneficially owned by Darby
Financial Products, 4,261,126 shares beneficially owned by Susquehanna Investment Group, and 45,106,707 shares
beneficially owned by Susquehanna Securities, LLC. Susquehanna Advisors Group, Inc. is the investment manager to Capital
Ventures International, and therefore may be deemed to beneficially own the shares owned by Capital Ventures International.
Susquehanna Investment Group and Susquehanna Securities, LLC are affiliated independent broker-dealers which, together
with Capital Ventures International, Darby Financial Products and Susquehanna Advisors Group, Inc., may be deemed to be a
group (the “Capital Ventures Group”). The address for Capital Ventures International is P.O. Box 897, Windward 1, Regatta
Office Park, West Bay Road, Grand Cayman, KY1-1103, Cayman Islands. The address of each of Darby Financial Products,
Susquehanna Advisors Group, Inc., Susquehanna Investment Group and Susquehanna Securities, LLC is 401 E. City Ave,
Suite 220, Bala Cynwyd, PA 19004. The foregoing information is based solely on Amendment No. 2 to Schedule 13G filed on
February 16, 2021 jointly by the Capital Ventures Group, which we do not know or have reason to believe is not complete or
accurate and on which we are relying pursuant to applicable SEC regulations.
(5)Includes 353,133 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(6)Includes 537,343 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(7)Includes 147,639 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(8)Includes 723,881 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(9)Includes 698,886 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(10)Includes 180,557 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(11)Includes (i) 1,304,390 shares owned by AJG Growth Fund LLC (“Growth Fund”), including 1,304,285 shares are pledged as
collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness, and (ii) 431,458 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within
60 days of December 31, 2020. Mr. Gracias is the fund manager for Growth Fund. The address for this entity is 875 North
Michigan Avenue, Suite 3214, Chicago, IL 60611.
(12)Includes 84,450 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(13)Includes (i) 52,425 shares held by the Seven Hills Trust and (ii) 382,225 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable
within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(14)Includes 181,472 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020. Includes
114,848 shares pledged as collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness.
(15)Includes 150,005 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2020.
(16)Includes 60,509,999 shares issuable upon exercise of options held by our current executive officers and directors within 60
days after December 31, 2020.
ITEM 13.CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Review of Related Party Transactions
In accordance with the charter for the Audit Committee of the Board, our Audit Committee reviews and approves in advance
any proposed related person transactions.
For purposes of these procedures, “related person” and “transaction” have the meanings contained in Item 404 of Regulation
S-K.
26
 
The individuals and entities that are considered “related persons” include:
 • Directors, nominees for director and executive officers of Tesla;
 • Any person known to be the beneficial owner of five percent or more of Tesla’s common stock (a “5% Stockholder”);
and
 • Any immediate family member, as defined in Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K, of a director, nominee for director,
executive officer or 5% Stockholder.
In accordance with our Related Person Transactions Policy and Procedures, the Audit Committee must review and approve all
transactions in which (i) Tesla or one of its subsidiaries is a participant, (ii) the amount involved exceeds $120,000 and (iii) a related
person has a direct or indirect material interest, other than transactions available to all Tesla employees generally.
In assessing a related party transaction brought before it for approval the Audit Committee considers, among other factors it
deems appropriate, whether the related party transaction is on terms no less favorable than terms generally available to an
unaffiliated third-party under the same or similar circumstances and the extent of the related person’s interest in the transaction. The
Audit Committee may then approve or disapprove the transaction in its discretion.
Any related person transaction will be disclosed in the applicable SEC filing as required by the rules of the SEC.
Related Party Transactions
SpaceX
Elon Musk is the Chief Executive Officer, Chief Technical Officer and a significant stockholder of SpaceX. Kimbal Musk and
Antonio Gracias, who are members of the Board, are also members of the board of directors of SpaceX. In addition, certain
members of the Board, and/or investment funds affiliated with them, have made minority investments in SpaceX.
SpaceX purchased Tesla Energy systems and components and related services from Tesla for an aggregate $1.5 million in
2020 and an aggregate $0.2 million in 2021 through March in standard sales processes. The prices were negotiated in good faith.
SpaceX has purchased and may purchase in the future certain vehicle components from Tesla, including with modifications for
non-vehicle applications. The prices for such components and any associated labor and support, which were negotiated in good faith
and were consistent with prices offered to other third parties to whom any such components have been sold, were $2.6 million in the
aggregate in 2020 and $2.1 million in the aggregate in 2021 through March.
Tesla has provided SpaceX certain engineering support and resources from time to time upon the mutual agreement of the
parties and at costs per hour that were negotiated in good faith. SpaceX incurred an aggregate $0.1 million in 2020 for such support
and resources.
In 2020, Tesla built a custom tool for SpaceX at its tool machining facility at a cost of $0.7 million. The pricing for such
project, including labor hours, was negotiated in good faith, and such work took place during previously scheduled downtime at
Tesla’s facility.
In 2020, Tesla granted to SpaceX a limited non-perpetual license to certain software, as to which Tesla retains all intellectual
property rights. Such license was renewed in 2021 and is scheduled to expire by February 2022. The aggregate fees for the license
through its scheduled term were negotiated in good faith and are expected to be $0.1 million.
27
 
Since April 2016, SpaceX has invoiced Tesla for our use of an aircraft owned and operated by SpaceX at rates determined by
Tesla and SpaceX, subject to rules of the Federal Aviation Administration governing such arrangements. Tesla incurred $0.6 million
in 2020 and has incurred $0.1 million in 2021 through March.
Other Transactions
Elon Musk is a co-founder and significant stockholder of The Boring Company, which purchased Tesla Energy systems and
related services from us for $0.3 million in the aggregate during 2020. The prices were negotiated in good faith.
Entities affiliated with our Board member Lawrence J. Ellison purchased Tesla Energy systems and related services from us
for $2.2 million in the aggregate during 2020 and $0.6 million in 2021 through March. The prices were negotiated in good faith.
In February 2020, Messrs. Elon Musk and Ellison purchased from us 65,185 and 6,250 shares, respectively (as adjusted for the
Stock Split), of our common stock in a public offering at the public offering price for an aggregate $11 million.
In the ordinary course of business, we enter into offer letters with our executive officers. We have also entered into
indemnification agreements with each of our directors and officers. The indemnification agreements and our certificate of
incorporation and bylaws require us to indemnify our directors and officers to the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law. In 2020,
Tesla entered into an agreement with Elon Musk relating to the indemnification of directors and officers for an interim period of 90
days pursuant to which Tesla paid Mr. Musk an aggregate $3 million, as described in “Director Independence” under this Item 13
below.  
Director Independence
The Board periodically assesses, with the recommendation of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, the
independence of its non-employee members as defined in the listing standards of NASDAQ and applicable laws. The Board
undertook an analysis for each non-employee director and considered all relevant facts and circumstances, including the director’s
other commercial, accounting, legal, banking, consulting, charitable and familial relationships. The Board determined that with
respect to each of its current members other than Elon Musk, who is our Chief Executive Officer, and Kimbal Musk, who is Elon
Musk’s brother, there are no disqualifying factors with respect to director independence enumerated in the listing standards of
NASDAQ or any relationships that would interfere with the exercise of independent judgment in carrying out the responsibilities of
a director, and that each such member is an “independent director” as defined in the listing standards of NASDAQ and applicable
laws.
In particular, the Board reviewed the following considerations:
 • Ira Ehrenpreis, Antonio Gracias, James Murdoch, Elon Musk, Kimbal Musk, and/or investment funds affiliated with
them, have made minority investments in certain companies or investment funds (i) of which other Tesla directors are
founders, significant stockholders, directors, officers, or managers, and/or (ii) with which Tesla has had certain
relationships, such as those set forth in “Related Party Transactions” under this Item 13 above. The Board concluded
that none of these investments are material so as to impede the exercise of independent judgment by any of Messrs.
Ehrenpreis, Gracias or Mr. Murdoch, and that none of them has a direct or indirect interest in any transaction between
Tesla and another company such as those set forth in “Related Party Transactions” under this Item 13 above.
 • Mr. Gracias is a director of SpaceX, (i) of which Elon Musk and Kimbal Musk are also directors, and (ii) with which
Tesla has had certain relationships, such as those set forth in “Related Party Transactions—SpaceX” under this Item 13
above. The Board concluded that Mr. Gracias is an experienced investment professional who has served on the boards of
multiple companies without conflict or impairment of independent judgment.
 • Lawrence J. Ellison, and/or entities affiliated with him, have purchased certain Tesla products and services from Tesla,
such as those set forth in “Related Party Transactions—Other Transactions” under
28
 
 this Item 13 above. The Board concluded that such purchases were negotiated and completed through ordinary course
sales processes in good faith on terms generally available to similar customers, and would not impair the independent
judgment of Mr. Ellison.
 • Mr. Ellison is an officer of a company from which Tesla has purchased business services. The Board concluded that such
purchases were for standard offerings in the ordinary course of business pursuant to good faith contracting processes in
which Mr. Ellison was neither involved nor had any material interest.
 • As previously disclosed by Tesla, Elon Musk had previously agreed to provide certain directors’ and officers’ indemnity
coverage to us from his personal funds, which the Board concluded did not impair the independent judgment of the other
members of the Board.
In addition, prior to his departure from the Board in September 2020, the Board had determined that Stephen Jurvetson was an
independent director as defined in the listing standards of NASDAQ and applicable laws.
ITEM 14.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Principal Accounting Fees and Services
The following table presents fees billed for professional audit services and other services rendered to Tesla by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2020. The dollar amounts in the table and accompanying
footnotes are in thousands.
             2019   2020  
Audit Fees (1)  $ 12,527   $ 12,965 
Audit-Related Fees   —    — 
Tax Fees (2)   999    1,456 
All Other Fees (3)   9    103 
         
Total  $ 13,535   $ 14,524 
 
(1)Audit Fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of Tesla’s consolidated financial statements
included in Tesla’s Annual Report on Form 10-K and for the review of the financial statements included in Tesla’s Quarterly
Reports on Form 10-Q, as well as services that generally only Tesla’s independent registered public accounting firm can
reasonably provide, including statutory audits and services rendered in connection with SEC filings. The Audit Fees incurred
in 2019 and 2020 also include fees of $435 and $825, respectively, relating to services performed in connection with Tesla’s
securities offerings, in each case including comfort letters, consents and review of documents filed with the SEC and other
offering documents.
(2)Tax Fees in 2019 and 2020 consisted of fees related to consultation and compliance services.
(3)Other Fees in 2019 and 2020 consisted of a Gigafactory Berlin current state assessment and fees for the use of accounting
software.
29
 
Pre-Approval of Audit and Non-Audit Services
Tesla’s Audit Committee has adopted a policy for pre-approving audit and non-audit services and associated fees of Tesla’s
independent registered public accounting firm. Under this policy, the Audit Committee must pre- approve all services and associated
fees provided to Tesla by its independent registered public accounting firm, with certain de minimis exceptions described in the
policy.
All PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP services and fees in fiscal 2019 and 2020 were pre-approved by the Audit Committee.
 
30
 
 
PART IV
ITEM 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
1. Financial statements (see Index to Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of the Original Form 10-K).
 
2. All financial statement schedules have been omitted since the required information was not applicable or was not present in
amounts sufficient to require submission of the schedules, or because the information required is included in the consolidated
financial statements or the accompanying notes.
 
3. The exhibits listed in the following Index to Exhibits are filed or incorporated by reference as part of this report.
 
 
31
 
 
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    3.1
  Amended and Restated
Certificate of Incorporation
of the Registrant.   10-K   001-34756   3.1   March 1, 2017
   
             
    3.2
 Certificate of Amendment
to the Amended and
Restated Certificate of
Incorporation of the
Registrant.  10-K  001-34756  3.2  March 1, 2017
  
             
    3.3
  Amended and Restated
Bylaws of the Registrant.  8-K   001-34756   3.2   February 1, 2017
   
             
    4.1
  Specimen common stock
certificate of the
Registrant.   10-K   001-34756   4.1   March 1, 2017
   
             
    4.2
  Fifth Amended and
Restated Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of
August 31, 2009, between
Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s
capital stock named
therein.   S-1   333-164593   4.2   January 29, 2010
   
             
    4.3
  Amendment to Fifth
Amended and Restated
Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of
May 20, 2010, between
Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s
capital stock named
therein.   S-1/A   333-164593   4.2A   May 27, 2010
   
             
    4.4
  Amendment to Fifth
Amended and Restated
Investors’ Rights
Agreement between
Registrant, Toyota Motor
Corporation and certain
holders of the Registrant’s
capital stock named
therein.   S-1/A   333-164593   4.2B   May 27, 2010
   
             
    4.5
  Amendment to Fifth
Amended and Restated
Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of
June 14, 2010, between
Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s
capital stock named
therein.   S-1/A   333-164593   4.2C   June 15, 2010
   
32
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.6
  Amendment to Fifth
Amended and Restated
Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of
November 2, 2010,
between Registrant and
certain holders of the
Registrant’s capital stock
named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   November 4, 2010
   
             
    4.7
  Waiver to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investor’s
Rights Agreement, dated as
of May 22, 2011, between
Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s
capital stock named
therein.   S-1/A   333-174466   4.2E   June 2, 2011
   
             
    4.8
  Amendment to Fifth
Amended and Restated
Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of
May 30, 2011, between
Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s
capital stock named
therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   June 1, 2011
   
             
    4.9
  Sixth Amendment to Fifth
Amended and Restated
Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of
May 15, 2013 among the
Registrant, the Elon Musk
Revocable Trust dated
July 22, 2003 and certain
other holders of the capital
stock of the Registrant
named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 20, 2013
   
33
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.10
  Waiver to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investor’s
Rights Agreement, dated as
of May 14, 2013, between
the Registrant and certain
holders of the capital stock
of the Registrant named
therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.2   May 20, 2013
   
             
    4.11
  Waiver to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investor’s
Rights Agreement, dated as
of August 13, 2015,
between the Registrant and
certain holders of the
capital stock of the
Registrant named therein.  8-K   001-34756   4.1   August 19, 2015
   
             
    4.12
  Waiver to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investors’
Rights Agreement, dated as
of May 18, 2016, between
the Registrant and certain
holders of the capital stock
of the Registrant named
therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 24, 2016
   
             
    4.13
 Waiver to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investors’
Rights Agreement, dated as
of March 15, 2017,
between the Registrant and
certain holders of the
capital stock of the
Registrant named therein. 8-K   001-34756   4.1   March 17, 2017
   
             
    4.14
 Waiver to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investors’
Rights Agreement, dated as
of May 1, 2019, between
the Registrant and certain
holders of the capital stock
of the Registrant named
therein.  8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 3, 2019
   
    4.15
  Indenture, dated as of May
22, 2013, by and between
the Registrant and U.S.
Bank National Association.  8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 22, 2013
   
34
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.16
 Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 5, 2014, by and
between the Registrant and
U.S. Bank National
Association.  8-K  001-34756  4.4  March 5, 2014
  
             
    4.17
 Form of 1.25% Convertible
Senior Note Due March 1,
2021 (included in
Exhibit 4.16).  8-K  001-34756  4.4  March 5, 2014
  
             
    4.18
 Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 22, 2017, by and
between the Registrant and
U.S. Bank National
Association. 8-K  001-34756  4.2  March 22, 2017
  
             
    4.19
 Form of 2.375%
Convertible Senior Note
Due March 15, 2022
(included in Exhibit 4.18). 8-K  001-34756  4.2  March 22, 2017
  
             
    4.20
 Fifth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
7, 2019, by and between
Registrant and U.S. Bank
National Association,
related to 2.00%
Convertible Senior Notes
due May 15, 2024.  8-K  001-34756  4.2  May 8, 2019
  
             
    4.21
 Form of 2.00% Convertible
Senior Notes due May 15,
2024 (included in Exhibit
4.20).  8-K  001-34756  4.2  May 8, 2019
  
             
    4.22
 Indenture, dated as of
August 18, 2017, by and
among the Registrant,
SolarCity, and U.S. Bank
National Association, as
trustee. 8-K  001-34756  4.1  August 23, 2017
  
             
    4.23
 Form of 5.30% Senior
Note due August 15, 2025. 8-K  001-34756  4.2  August 23, 2017
  
35
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.24  Indenture, dated as of
October 15, 2014, between
SolarCity and U.S. Bank
National Association, as
trustee. S-3ASR(1) 333-199321  4.1  October 15, 2014   
             
    4.25  Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
October 15, 2014, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2014/4-7. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  October 15, 2014   
             
    4.26  Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/4-7. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  January 29, 2015   
             
    4.27  Tenth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 9, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/6-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  March 9, 2015   
    4.28  Eleventh Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 9, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/7-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  March 9, 2015   
             
    4.29  Fifteenth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 19, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C4-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  March 19, 2015
  
             
    4.30  Sixteenth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 19, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C5-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  March 19, 2015
  
36
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.31  Twentieth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C9-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  March 26, 2015
  
             
    4.32  Twenty-First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C10-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  March 26, 2015
  
             
    4.33  Twenty-Sixth
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 2, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C14-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 2, 2015
  
             
    4.34  Thirtieth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
9, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C19-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 9, 2015
  
             
    4.35  Thirty-First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
9, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C20-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  April 9, 2015
  
             
    4.36  Thirty-Fifth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C24-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 14, 2015
  
37
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.37  Thirty-Sixth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C25-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  April 14, 2015
  
             
    4.38  Thirty-Eighth
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 21, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C27-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  April 21, 2015
  
             
    4.39  Thirty-Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
21, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C28-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  April 21, 2015
  
             
    4.40  Forty-Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
27, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C32-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 27, 2015
  
             
    4.41  Forty-Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April
27, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C33-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  April 27, 2015
  
             
    4.42  Forty-Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
1, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.00% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/12-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 1, 2015
  
38
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.43  Forty-Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
1, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.75% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/13-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  May 1, 2015
  
             
    4.44  Fifty-Second Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
11, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C36-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 11, 2015
  
             
    4.45  Fifty-Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
11, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C37-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 11, 2015
  
             
    4.46  Fifty-Seventh
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 18, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C40-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 18, 2015
  
             
    4.47  Fifty-Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
18, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C41-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 18, 2015
  
39
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.48  Sixty-First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May
26, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C44-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 26, 2015
  
             
    4.49  Sixty-Second
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 26, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C45-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 26, 2015
  
             
    4.50  Seventieth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June
16, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C52-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  June 16, 2015
  
             
    4.51  Seventy-First
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 16, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C53-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 16, 2015
  
             
    4.52  Seventy-Fourth
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 22, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C56-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  June 23, 2015
  
             
    4.53  Seventy-Fifth
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 22, 2015,
by and between SolarCity
and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C57-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 23, 2015
  
40
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.54  Eightieth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June
29, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C61-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 29, 2015
  
             
    4.55  Eighty-First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June
29, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C62-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  June 29, 2015
  
             
    4.56  Ninetieth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July
20, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C71-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  July 21, 2015
  
             
    4.57  Ninety-First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July
20, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C72-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  July 21, 2015
  
             
    4.58  Ninety-Fifth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July
31, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.00% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/20-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  July 31, 2015
  
             
    4.59  Ninety-Sixth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July
31, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.75% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/21-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  July 31, 2015
  
41
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.60  One Hundred-and-Fifth
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of August 10,
2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C81-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  August 10, 2015
  
             
    4.61  One Hundred-and-Eleventh
Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of August 17,
2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.45% Solar Bonds, Series
2015/C87-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  August 17, 2015
  
             
    4.62  One Hundred-and-
Sixteenth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
August 24, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C92-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  August 24, 2015
  
             
    4.63  One Hundred-and-Twenty-
First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
August 31, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C97-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  August 31, 2015
  
             
    4.64  One Hundred-and-Twenty-
Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
September 14, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C101-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  September 15, 2015
  
42
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.65  One Hundred-and-Twenty-
Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
September 14, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C102-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  September 15, 2015
  
             
    4.66  One Hundred-and-Thirty-
Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C106-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  September 29, 2015
  
             
    4.67  One Hundred-and-Thirty-
Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C107-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  September 29, 2015
  
             
    4.68  One Hundred-and-Thirty-
Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
October 13, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C111-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  October 13, 2015
  
             
    4.69  One Hundred-and-Forty-
Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
October 30, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/25-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  October 30, 2015
  
43
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.70  One Hundred-and-Forty-
Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
October 30, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/26-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  October 30, 2015
  
             
    4.71  One Hundred-and-Forty-
Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
November 4, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C116-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  November 4, 2015
  
             
    4.72  One Hundred-and-Fifty-
Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
November 16, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C121-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  November 17, 2015
  
             
    4.73  One Hundred-and-Fifty-
Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
November 16, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C122-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  November 17, 2015
  
             
    4.74  One Hundred-and-Fifty-
Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
November 30, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C126-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  November 30, 2015
  
             
    4.75  One Hundred-and-Fifty-
Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
November 30, 2015, by
and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C127-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  November 30, 2015
  
44
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.76  One Hundred-and-Sixty-
Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
December 14, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C131-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  December 14, 2015
  
             
    4.77  One Hundred-and-Sixty-
Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
December 14, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C132-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  December 14, 2015
  
             
    4.78  One Hundred-and-Sixty-
Seventh Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
December 28, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C135-
5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  December 28, 2015
  
             
    4.79  One Hundred-and-Sixty-
Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
December 28, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C136-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  December 28, 2015
  
             
    4.80  One Hundred-and-Sixty-
Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
December 28, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C137-
15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  December 28, 2015
  
45
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.81  One Hundred-and-Seventy-
Second Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2016, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2016/3-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  January 29, 2016
  
             
    4.82  One Hundred-and-Seventy-
Third Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2016, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2016/4-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  January 29, 2016
  
             
    4.83  One Hundred-and-Seventy-
Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2016, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar
Bonds, Series 2016/5-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  January 29, 2016
  
             
    4.84  One Hundred-and-Seventy-
Seventh Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
February 26, 2016, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.25% Solar
Bonds, Series 2016/8-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  February 26, 2016
  
             
    4.85  One Hundred-and-Seventy-
Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of
March 21, 2016, by and
between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.25% Solar
Bonds, Series 2016/10-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  March 21, 2016
  
46
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
    4.86  One Hundred-and-Eighty-
First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June
10, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s
5.25% Solar Bonds, Series
2016/12-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  June 10, 2016
  
             
    4.87  Description of Registrant’s
Securities 10-K  001-34756  4.119  February 13, 2020
  
             
  10.1**
  Form of Indemnification
Agreement between the
Registrant and its directors
and officers.   S-1/A   333-164593   10.1   June 15, 2010
   
             
  10.2**
  2003 Equity Incentive
Plan.   S-1/A   333-164593   10.2   May 27, 2010
   
             
  10.3**
  Form of Stock Option
Agreement under 2003
Equity Incentive Plan.   S-1   333-164593   10.3   January 29, 2010
   
             
  10.4**
  Amended and Restated
2010 Equity Incentive
Plan.   10-K   001-34756   10.4  February 23, 2018
  
             
  10.5**
  Form of Stock Option
Agreement under 2010
Equity Incentive Plan.   10-K   001-34756   10.6   March 1, 2017
   
             
  10.6**
  Form of Restricted Stock
Unit Award Agreement
under 2010 Equity
Incentive Plan.   10-K   001-34756   10.7   March 1, 2017
   
             
  10.7**
  Amended and Restated
2010 Employee Stock
Purchase Plan, effective as
of February 1, 2017.  10-K   001-34756   10.8   March 1, 2017
   
             
  10.8**
  2019 Equity Incentive
Plan.   S-8   333-232079   4.2  June 12, 2019
  
             
  10.9**
  Form of Stock Option
Agreement under 2019
Equity Incentive Plan.   S-8   333-232079   4.3   June 12, 2019
   
             
  10.10**
  Form of Restricted Stock
Unit Award Agreement
under 2019 Equity
Incentive Plan.   S-8   333-232079   4.4   June 12, 2019
   
             
  10.11**
  Employee Stock Purchase
Plan, effective as of June
12, 2019.   S-8   333-232079   4.5   June 12, 2019
   
47
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.12**
 2007 SolarCity Stock Plan
and form of agreements
used thereunder. S-1(1) 333-184317 10.2 October 5, 2012
  
             
  10.13**
 2012 SolarCity Equity
Incentive Plan and form of
agreements used
thereunder.  S-1(1)  333-184317  10.3  October 5, 2012
  
             
  10.14**
 2010 Zep Solar, Inc. Equity
Incentive Plan and form of
agreements used
thereunder.  S-8(1)  333-192996  4.5  December 20, 2013
  
             
  10.15**
  Offer Letter between the
Registrant and Elon Musk
dated October 13, 2008.  S-1   333-164593   10.9   January 29, 2010
   
             
  10.16**
 Performance Stock Option
Agreement between the
Registrant and Elon Musk
dated January 21, 2018. DEF 14A  001-34756  Appendix A February 8, 2018
  
             
  10.17**
 Maxwell Technologies,
Inc. 2005 Omnibus Equity
Incentive Plan, as amended
through May 6, 2010  8-K(2)  001-15477  10.1  May 10, 2010
  
             
  10.18**
 Maxwell Technologies,
Inc. 2013 Omnibus Equity
Incentive Plan  DEF 14A(2) 001-15477  Appendix A June 2, 2017
  
             
  10.19
 Indemnification
Agreement, effective as of
June 23, 2020, between
Registrant and Elon R.
Musk.  10-Q  001-34756  10.4  July 28, 2020
  
             
  10.20
 Indemnification
Agreement, dated as of
February 27, 2014, by and
between the Registrant and
J.P. Morgan Securities
LLC.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.21
 Form of Call Option
Confirmation relating to
1.25% Convertible Senior
Notes Due March 1, 2021. 8-K  001-34756  10.3  March 5, 2014
  
48
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.22
 Form of Warrant
Confirmation relating to
1.25% Convertible Senior
Notes Due March 1, 2021. 8-K  001-34756  10.5  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.23
 Form of Call Option
Confirmation relating to
2.375% Convertible Notes
due March 15, 2022.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  March 22, 2017
  
             
  10.24
 Form of Warrant
Confirmation relating to
2.375% Convertible Notes
due March 15, 2022.  8-K  001-34756  10.2  March 22, 2017
  
             
  10.25
 Form of Call Option
Confirmation relating to
2.00% Convertible Senior
Notes due May 15, 2024. 8-K  001-34756  10.1  May 3, 2019
  
             
  10.26
 Form of Warrant
Confirmation relating to
2.00% Convertible Senior
Notes due May 15, 2024. 8-K  001-34756  10.2  May 3, 2019
  
             
  10.27†
  Supply Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated
October 5, 2011.   10-K   001-34756   10.50   February 27, 2012
   
             
  10.28†
  Amendment No. 1 to
Supply Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated
October 29, 2013.   10-K   001-34756   10.35A   February 26, 2014
   
             
  10.29
 Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated July 31,
2014.  10-Q  001-34756  10.1  November 7, 2014
  
             
  10.30†
 General Terms and
Conditions between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated
October 1, 2014.  8-K  001-34756  10.2  October 11, 2016
  
49
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.31
 Letter Agreement, dated as
of February 24, 2015,
regarding addition of co-
party to General Terms and
Conditions, Production
Pricing Agreement and
Investment Letter
Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant.  10-K  001-34756  10.25A  February 24, 2016
  
 
             
  10.32†
 Amendment to Gigafactory
General Terms, dated
March 1, 2016, by and
among the Registrant,
Panasonic Corporation and
Panasonic Energy
Corporation of North
America.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  October 11, 2016
  
             
  10.33††
 Amended and Restated
General Terms and
Conditions for Gigafactory,
entered into on June 10,
2020, by and among
Registrant, Tesla Motors
Netherlands B.V.,
Panasonic Corporation and
Panasonic Corporation of
North America.  10-Q  001-34756  10.2  July 28, 2020
  
             
  10.34†
 Production Pricing
Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated
October 1, 2014.  10-Q  001-34756  10.3  November 7, 2014
  
             
  10.35†
 Investment Letter
Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated
October 1, 2014.  10-Q  001-34756  10.4  November 7, 2014
  
             
  10.36
 Amendment to Gigafactory
Documents, dated April 5,
2016, by and among the
Registrant, Panasonic
Corporation, Panasonic
Corporation of North
America and Panasonic
Energy Corporation of
North America.  10-Q  001-34756  10.2  May 10, 2016
  
50
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.37††
 2019 Pricing Agreement
(Japan Cells) with respect
to 2011 Supply Agreement,
executed September 20,
2019, by and among the
Registrant, Tesla Motors
Netherlands B.V.,
Panasonic Corporation and
SANYO Electric Co., Ltd. 10-Q  001-34756  10.6  October 29, 2019
  
             
  10.38††
 2020 Pricing Agreement
(Gigafactory 2170 Cells),
entered into on June 9,
2020, by and among
Registrant, Tesla Motors
Netherlands B.V.,
Panasonic Corporation and
Panasonic Corporation of
North America.  10-Q  001-34756  10.3  July 28, 2020
  
             
  10.39††
 2021 Pricing Agreement
(Japan Cells) with respect
to 2011 Supply Agreement,
executed December 29,
2020, by and among the
Registrant, Tesla Motors
Netherlands B.V.,
Panasonic Corporation of
North America and
SANYO Electric Co., Ltd. 10-K   001-34756    10.39   February 8, 2021
  
             
  10.40††
 Amended and Restated
Factory Lease, executed as
of March 26, 2019, by and
between the Registrant and
Panasonic Energy North
America, a division of
Panasonic Corporation of
North America, as tenant. 10-Q  001-34756  10.3  July 29, 2019
  
             
  10.41††
 Lease Amendment,
executed September 20,
2019, by and among the
Registrant, Panasonic
Corporation of North
America, on behalf of its
division Panasonic Energy
of North America, with
respect to the Amended and
Restated Factory Lease,
executed as of March 26,
2019.  10-Q  001-34756  10.7  October 29, 2019
  
51
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.42††
 Second Lease Amendment,
entered into on June 9,
2020, by and between the
Registrant and Panasonic
Energy of North America, a
division of Panasonic
Corporation of North
America, with respect to
the Amended and Restated
Factory Lease dated
January 1, 2017.  10-Q  001-34756  10.1  July 28, 2020
  
             
  10.43
 Amendment and
Restatement in respect of
ABL Credit Agreement,
dated as of March 6, 2019,
by and among certain of
the Registrant’s and Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V.’s
direct or indirect
subsidiaries from time to
time party thereto, as
borrowers, Wells Fargo
Bank, National
Association, as
documentation agent,
JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A., Goldman Sachs Bank
USA, Morgan Stanley
Senior Funding Inc. and
Bank of America, N.A., as
syndication agents, the
lenders from time to time
party thereto, and Deutsche
Bank AG New York
Branch, as administrative
agent and collateral agent. S-4/A 333-229749   10.68   April 3, 2019  
   
             
  10.44  First Amendment to
Amended and Restated
ABL Credit Agreement,
dated as of December 23,
2020, in respect of the
Amended and Restated
ABL Credit Agreement,
dated as of March 6, 2019,
by and among certain of
the Registrant’s and Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V.’s
direct or indirect
subsidiaries from time to
time party thereto, as
borrowers, Wells Fargo
Bank, National
Association, as
documentation agent,
JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A., Goldman Sachs Bank
USA, Morgan Stanley
Senior Funding Inc. and
Bank of America, N.A., as
syndication agents, the
lenders from time to time
party thereto, and Deutsche
Bank AG New York 10-K   001-34756    10.44   February 8, 2021   
Branch, as administrative
agent and collateral agent.
52
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.45†
 
 Agreement for Tax
Abatement and Incentives,
dated as of May 7, 2015,
by and between Tesla
Motors, Inc. and the State
of Nevada, acting by and
through the Nevada
Governor’s Office of
Economic Development. 10-Q  001-34756  10.1  August 7, 2015
  
             
  10.46††
 Second Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of
August 28, 2020, by and
among Tesla 2014
Warehouse SPV LLC,
Tesla Finance LLC, the
Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party
thereto, Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas,
as Paying Agent, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as
Administrative Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.2  October 26, 2020
  
53
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.47†
 Loan and Security
Agreement, executed on
December 28, 2018, by and
among LML 2018
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla Finance LLC, the
Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party
thereto, Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas,
as Paying Agent, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as
Administrative Agent.  10-K    001-34756   10.55    February 19, 2019  
   
             
  10.48††
 Letter of Consent, dated as
of June 14, 2019, by and
among LML 2018
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as
Administrative Agent, and
the Group Agents party
thereto, in respect of the
Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of
August 17, 2017 and as
amended from time to
time, by and among LML
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla Finance LLC, and the
Lenders, Group Agents and
Administrative Agent from
time to time party thereto. 10-Q    001-34756   10.1    July 29, 2019  
   
             
  10.49††
 Amendment No. 1 to Loan
and Security Agreement,
dated as of August 16,
2019, by and among LML
2018 Warehouse SPV,
LLC, Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as
Paying Agent, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as
Administrative Agent, and
the Lenders and Group
Agents from time to time
party thereto.  10-Q    001-34756   10.2    October 29, 2019  
   
54
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.50
 Amendment No. 2 to Loan
and Security Agreement,
dated as of December 13,
2019, by and among LML
2018 Warehouse SPV,
LLC, Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as
Paying Agent, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as
Administrative Agent, and
the Lenders and Group
Agents from time to time
party thereto.  10-K   001-34756   10.69   February 13, 2020
   
             
  10.51  Letter of Consent, dated
February 18, 2020, by and
among LML 2018
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla 2014 Warehouse SPV
LLC, LLC and Deutsche
Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative
Agent and as Group Agent
under the 2018 Loan
Agreement and the 2014
Loan Agreement, and the
Group Agents party
thereto, in respect of (i) the
Loan and Security
Agreement, dated
December 27, 2018 and as
amended from time to
time, among LML 2018
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla Finance LLC,
Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americans, as
Paying Agent, Deutsche
Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative
Agent, the lenders parties
and agent parties thereto,
and (ii) the Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated August
17, 2017 and as amended
from time to time, among
Tesla 2014 Warehouse SPV
LLC, Tesla Finance LLC,
the lenders and group
agents party thereto,
Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as
Paying Agent, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as
Administrative Agent. 10-Q  001-34756  10.1  April 30, 2020
  
55
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.52†† Letter of Consent, dated as
of August 14, 2020, by and
among LML 2018
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla 2014 Warehouse SPV
LLC, Deutsche Bank AG,
New York Branch, as
Administrative Agent and
Group Agent, and the
Group Agents party
thereto, in respect of (i) the
Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of
December 27, 2018 and as
amended from time to
time, by and among LML
2018 Warehouse SPV,
LLC, Tesla Finance LLC,
and the Lenders, Group
Agents, Paying Agent and
Administrative Agent from
time to time party
thereto, and (ii) the
Amended and Restated
Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of
August 17, 2017 and as
amended from time to
time, by and among LML
Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla Finance LLC, and the
Lenders, Group Agents and
Administrative Agent from
time to time party thereto. 10-Q  001-34756  10.1  October 26, 2020
  
             
  10.53  Payoff and Termination
Letter, executed on August
28, 2020, by and among
LML 2018 Warehouse
SPV, LLC, the Lenders and
Group Agents from time to
time party thereto,
Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as
Paying Agent and Deutsche
Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative
Agent, relating to Loan and
Security Agreement. 10-Q  001-34756  10.3  October 26, 2020
  
56
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.54  Purchase Agreement, dated
as of August 11, 2017, by
and among the Registrant,
SolarCity and Goldman
Sachs & Co. LLC and
Morgan Stanley & Co.
LLC as representatives of
the several initial
purchasers named therein. 8-K  001-34756  10.1  August 23, 2017
  
             
  10.55
 Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of September
2, 2014, by and between
The Research Foundation
For The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16  November 6, 2014
  
             
  10.56
 First Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of October 31,
2014, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-K(1)  001-35758  10.16a  February 24, 2015
  
57
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.57
 Second Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of December
15, 2014, by and between
The Research Foundation
For The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-K(1)  001-35758  10.16b  February 24, 2015
  
             
  10.58
 Third Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of February 12,
2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16c  May 6, 2015
  
             
  10.59
 Fourth Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of March 30,
2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16d  May 6, 2015
  
58
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.60
 Fifth Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of June 30,
2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16e  July 30, 2015
  
             
  10.61
 Sixth Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of September
1, 2015, by and between
The Research Foundation
For The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16f  October 30, 2015
  
             
  10.62
 Seventh Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of October 9,
2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16g  October 30, 2015
  
59
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.63
 Eighth Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of October 26,
2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16h  October 30, 2015
  
             
  10.64
 Ninth Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of December 9,
2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-K(1)  001-35758  10.16i  February 10, 2016
  
             
  10.65
 Tenth Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of March 31,
2017, by and between The
Research Foundation For
The State University of
New York, on behalf of the
Colleges of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of
the State University of
New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q   001-34756   10.8   May 10, 2017
  
60
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.66
 Eleventh Amendment to
Amended and Restated
Agreement for Research &
Development Alliance on
Triex Module Technology,
effective as of July 22,
2020, among the Research
Foundation for the State
University of New York,
Silevo, LLC and Tesla
Energy Operations, Inc. 10-Q  001-34756  10.6  July 28, 2020
  
             
  10.67††
 Grant Contract for State-
Owned Construction Land
Use Right, dated as of
October 17, 2018, by and
between Shanghai Planning
and Land Resource
Administration Bureau, as
grantor, and Tesla
(Shanghai) Co., Ltd., as
grantee (English
translation). 10-Q   001-34756   10.2   July 29, 2019
  
             
  10.68††
 Facility Agreement, dated
as of September 26, 2019,
by and between China
Merchants Bank Co., Ltd.
Beijing Branch and Tesla
Automobile (Beijing) Co.,
Ltd. (English translation). 10-Q   001-34756   10.3   October 29, 2019
  
             
  10.69††
 Statement Letter to China
Merchants Bank Co., Ltd.
Beijing Branch from Tesla
Automobile (Beijing) Co.,
Ltd., dated as of September
26, 2019 (English
translation). 10-Q   001-34756   10.4   October 29, 2019
  
61
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.70††
 Fixed Asset Syndication
Loan Agreement, dated as
of December 18, 2019, by
and among Tesla
(Shanghai) Co., Ltd., China
Construction Bank
Corporation, China
(Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade
Zone Special Area Branch,
Agricultural Bank of China
Shanghai Changning Sub-
branch, Shanghai Pudong
Development Bank Co.,
Ltd., Shanghai Branch, and
Industrial and Commercial
Bank of China Limited,
China (Shanghai) Pilot
Free Trade Zone Special
Area Branch (English
translation). 10-K   001-34756    10.85    February 13, 2020
  
             
  10.71††
 Fixed Asset Syndication
Loan Agreement and
Supplemental Agreement,
dated as of December 18,
2019, by and among Tesla
(Shanghai) Co., Ltd., China
Construction Bank
Corporation, China
(Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade
Zone Special Area Branch,
Agricultural Bank of China
Shanghai Changning Sub-
branch, Shanghai Pudong
Development Bank Co.,
Ltd., Shanghai Branch, and
Industrial and Commercial
Bank of China Limited,
China (Shanghai) Pilot
Free Trade Zone Special
Area Branch (English
translation). 10-K   001-34756    10.86    February 13, 2020  
  
62
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.72††
 Syndication Revolving
Loan Agreement, dated as
of December 18, 2019, by
and among Tesla
(Shanghai) Co., Ltd. China
Construction Bank
Corporation, China
(Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade
Zone Special Area Branch,
Agricultural Bank of China
Shanghai Changning Sub-
branch, Shanghai Pudong
Development Bank Co.,
Ltd., Shanghai Branch, and
Industrial and Commercial
Bank of China Limited,
China (Shanghai) Pilot
Free Trade Zone Special
Area Branch (English
translation). 10-K    001-34756    10.87    February 13, 2020  
  
             
  10.73††
 Working Capital Loan
Contact, dated as of May 7,
2020, between Industrial
and Commercial Bank of
China, China (Shanghai)
Pilot Free Trade Zone
Lingang Special Area
Branch and Tesla
(Shanghai) Co., Ltd.  10-Q  001-34756   10.5  July 28, 2020
  
             
  21.1
 List of Subsidiaries of the
Registrant  10-K  001-34756  21.1  February 8, 2021  
  
             
  23.1
  Consent of
PricewaterhouseCoopers
LLP, Independent
Registered Public
Accounting Firm   10-K    001-34756      23.1    February 8, 2021  
   
             
  31.1
  Rule 13a-14(a) /
15(d)-14(a) Certification of
Principal Executive Officer  10-K     001-34756      31.1    February 8, 2021  
   
             
  31.2
  Rule 13a-14(a) /
15(d)-14(a) Certification of
Principal Financial Officer  10-K   001-34756      31.2    February 8, 2021  
   
             
  31.3
 Rule 13a-14(a) /
15(d)-14(a) Certification of
Principal Executive Officer —   —   —   —  
 X
63
 
Exhibit    Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit  Filing Date  Herewith
             
  31.4
 Rule 13a-14(a) /
15(d)-14(a) Certification of
Principal Financial Officer —   —   —   —  
 X
             
  32.1*   Section 1350 Certifications  10-K   001-34756    32.1   February 8, 2021    
             
101.INS*
  Inline XBRL Instance
Document   10-K   001-34756    101.INS   February 8, 2021
   
             
101.SCH*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy
Extension Schema
Document   10-K   001-34756    101.SCH   February 8, 2021
   
             
101.CAL*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy
Extension Calculation
Linkbase Document.   10-K   001-34756    101.CAL   February 8, 2021
   
             
101.DEF*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy
Extension Definition
Linkbase Document   10-K   001-34756    101.DEF   February 8, 2021
   
             
101.LAB*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy
Extension Label Linkbase
Document   10-K   001-34756    101.LAB   February 8, 2021
   
             
101.PRE*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy
Extension Presentation
Linkbase Document   10-K   001-34756    101.PRE   February 8, 2021
   
             
104
  Cover Page Interactive
Data File (formatted as
inline XBRL with
applicable taxonomy
extension information
contained in Exhibits 101)            
   
 
* Previously filed or furnished, as applicable, with Original Form 10-K
** Indicates a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement
† Confidential treatment has been requested for portions of this exhibit
†† Portions of this exhibit have been redacted in compliance with Regulation S-K Item 601(b)(10).
(1)Indicates a filing of SolarCity
(2)Indicates a filing of Maxwell Technologies, Inc.
 
64
 
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
  Tesla, Inc.
   
Date: April 30, 2021  /s/ Zachary J. Kirkhorn
  Zachary J. Kirkhorn
  Chief Financial Officer
  (Principal Financial Officer and
Duly Authorized Officer)
 
 
65
